French is an award-winning, internationally published author and poet. As she noted, she has eight books to her credit, including two popular series, Bodyguard and Chasing. Her latest, The Bodyguard and the Bodyguard is due out this year. She is also listed in several Who’s Who publications. She is a former paralegal, later founding a medical transcription service. Devoted to animals, she works for animal rights and donates some book proceeds to those causes. She lives on a mini-ranch in Tennessee. She is also a popular reviewer for Midwest Book Reviews. For more about French, visit her websites:
12 Insert a new Keyframe in frame 3 of the current layer, just like you did in step 10.
By Zafar Anjum
General Najiya: Fetch my luggage.
So you see now, our glories, written on the walls
Also out is Scout One, what Jim previously described as "a super-hero strip with a difference." Sha Nazir's art lends the story a gritty DC Thomson look, and the first issue again features three stories from the mythology of Scout One.
I keep it damp
‘This is exciting,’ she said. ‘Much better than judging boring hanging baskets. And of course we have private buses at Windsor but not so thrillingly dirty.’
MAD, BAD AND TOTALLY DANGEROUS - the last story in the series, and possibly the most scary - involves the ghosts of Lord Byron and his unhappy mistress Claire Clairmont. Abbie and Lauren are roped in to help at the local poetry festival. Abbie has bad vibes about this right from the start, and soon both girls realize that handsome poet Ron Lord is not what he seems. But the other young helper, Ruby, refuses to believe that the man she's throwing herself at is a ghost. All three girls are drawn into a nightmarish mix of past and present - with Byron's grand house and grounds providing the perfect gothic setting for the finale.
The best part...I have a paper pack to give away (thank you to Bazzill for providing this to us for one of our readers) It's valued at over $23.00...and the one lucky winner will receive a paper pack of 2 of each color shown here. Aren't the colors gorgeous?
I must admit I have missed it a bit. But other things have taken priority and I went through a few weeks of forgetting I even wrote a blog. How does that happen? I am not even sure myself.
Here's a bit of a sneak peek
After a night of soaking, I spread the fabric and artistically arranged the beautiful red veined leaves, added the stems and finally made a bundle (yes, I know, the bundle has to be more tightly tied).
As for my ROW 80 goals, I haven't been as on track as I'd like.
Source: advanced reading copy from publisher
1 tubs
From April, we will have two primary school teams on the road running sessions for parents every day; this booklet is designed to encourage and support parents in their role as “primary educators” of their children on fundamental matters of faith and relationships.
17 Red Light Company - With Lights Out
PAUL: Oh, obviously, because it’s about one page, if even that long. But…
What started off as a challenge for two head-strong career-driven individuals eventually become a stepping stone for falling in love. In How To Lose a Guy in 10 Days, Andie Anderson (Kate Hudson) is a writer for a woman’s magazine whose new piece is all about all the don’ts that women do that eventually drive men away. To write her piece, she vows to date someone and do all the things women do that make men break up with them all within a 10-day time frame. Benjamin Barry (Matthew McConaughey) is an exec who wants to land the new client – a billionaire who’s in the diamond business – by proving to his boss that he knows how to sell diamonds because he can make women fall in love with him. These two paths cross and as they try to set out their goals, one of them eventually wins.
Last update: 31/VIII/2008
I met Hitch only once, and found him charming, as most people did. He was strong minded in his arguments, and though I’ve watched hours of his debate on YouTube, I’ve never seen an instance of what I’d call “abuse”. Far more often people were abusive to him, as in the article above that calls him a drunk and urges him to contact Alcoholics Anonymous. He was opinionated and expressive, but rarely lost his temper unless, as he often was on television, baited by commenters.
I know I feel
And a great sadness when you are
A few days ago, I was asked to describe my teaching style. This is what I wrote: I differentiate for diverse learning styles and second language learners. My lessons incorporate direct instruction and high-level whole-class or small-group discussions followed by creative, independent work. Some will rightly point out that this teaching style is already practiced by many. It is known as the Gradual Release of Responsibility (GRR) method of instruction. Students know it as the “I (the teacher) do it, We do it (together), You do it (independently)” plan. In theory the method makes perfect sense: it allows for direct instruction and modeling, group discussions and cooperative learning, and independent work. But in practice it has one fatal flaw: priority is given to group work so that the amount of time students spend working independently is minimal (usually the last few minutes of class). If teachers follow this method, they will probably please their principals (which, let’s face it, is a big deal, especially now-a-days), but their students will not develop the necessary stamina for prolonged, focused, creative, independent work.
STARS is my debut. It is a 124,000 words YA novel.
Bring an elephant into your room. It will make people think, or, more accurately, it will make people want to think.
Stepping inside the door, I grabbed a shopping cart and put Polly into the fold out seat. Pip hopped on the end, and we rolled over to the photo counter. When I told the hulking, 22-year old clerk that we needed passport photos for all three of us, he took a deep breath. Then, he dug a digital camera out from a drawer and pointed us over to the end of the counter where a small projector screen hung down beside a desktop computer. While we waited for him to set things up, I explained to Pip that he needed to stand up straight in front of the screen and look directly at the camera when the clerk took his picture. I then asked him if he wanted to watch me first. He said yes, so I stood in front of the little screen, looked right at the camera, and held still while the clerk took a couple of pictures.
Step 12: Press it
It sucks that money makes this society go, but it is what it is. And P and Mouse don’t like to beg, so here’s our way of begging.
The former overused adage, I believe, can easily block a writer and tie him/her to the mundane things in life - a perfect reason for a reader to become bored and put a story to one side. People read to learn something or be entertained and unless you can add an element of difference, they will soon be unengaged.
Maybe it was the electric radio my mom bought me for Christmas. But it couldn’t be that, because nine days later, on January 3, 1964, one of my two brothers and my sister tried to take the radio away from me. I made the mistake of trying first to hang onto the radio, and then hanging onto the cord, accidentally pulling the cord out, so my Christmas present only worked for nine days.
Successful alumni relations programs can be compared to successful companies that employ strategic marketing and communications to create strong and lasting relationships with their customers. By utilizing newsletters, e-marketing, direct mail, web-based tools, social media and networking events, alumni programs can flourish and maintain communication between schools and alumni, creating a successful alumni database for on-going communication and growth.
So, am I a storyteller? I’m excited to get to the next section: Principles or Prescriptions? Structure, Character, Dialogue.
man am i ever tired…but it was all worth it.
I'd love to share them with everyone! (With credit, of course.)
So I know I should be happy that I will be joining them, but why do I feel more sad than joyful? I suppose, instinctively, I knew this is one of those life changing moments in our lives, that I was leaving a place and a time I can never go back to. Because when I do go back, I would no longer be the same man. And people and friends would have changed and moved on with their lives. And all that's left, sometimes, are our memories of days gone by.
Is a young entrepreneur and CEO of Digital Marketing Agency. As an accomplished and respected speaker worldwide he has worked alongside people such as James Caan, Doug Richards and Simon Woodroffe from Dragons Den. He has awards for speaking and thought leadership.
Since having their dress ripped to shreds was not something most brides wanted, they needed another idea of something "lucky" that they could throw into the crowd to keep their single lady friends under control.
Mike doesn't stick around. No pun intended. Hoping of catch Grace and her lover, he heads north to the Corday country home. Things become complicated when he confuses the unfaithful wife with her beautiful older sister. Some PI.
Then combine all the wet ingredients in a separate bowl.
This will be my last post until we get back. I’ll have my iPod Touch with me and will try to visit as many of you as possible. Until we get back I hope you all enjoy beautiful sunny days and peaceful star-filled nights.
I imagine some hustle and bustle, some commotion. I picture these people running up to the house carrying this man on a stretcher—yelling, “Clear the way! Move! Coming through! Make space! Man on a stretcher in need of grace!” And there sits all the Pharisees and Lawyers around Jesus—not budging an inch.
As we approached the bar an Ethel Stout type character greeted us:
I just bought two. When they go on sale I will buy 6 more!
Mr. Obama’s trip to Afghanistan comes at a time of fresh scrutiny of the war in the wake of a series of incidents that have strained relations between the U.S. and the Karzai government.
He chuckles. “”Its not like I’m trying to get security codes from you, I’ve got contacts for that,” he adds, “I just want to know your name.”
National laureate A Samad Said believes that Malaysians chose to keep their mouths shut, doing nothing; then ‘don’t blame the government. Blame yourself’.
Advance warning: True to form, this turned into a lengthy post with lots of blah-blah-blah, yet I can't bring myself to make any more cuts. So if you want to hear the whole nerd-tastic spiel, then read on, but if you just want to get to the photos, you should scroll down.
A woman in the shape of a monster
You will know all about it when your old and weak!
While I know some have complained that the Kimball card stock is not thick enough, it works fine for me. Mostly, I'm drawn to the art - both the close-up and the action down low.
Why was God pleased with Abraham? Why did he choose Abraham?
(The door opens and the three servants come in.)
66stage, with movies online even before they come out in the cinema nearby
Okay, enough vegging out. It's Saturday night almost Sunday morning and I need to get back to chapter eight!
While age limited policies may be continued for insureds that live past the age set in the policy, the cost may not be affordable. “The premiums may be prohibitively expensive, as much as 10 or even 20 times the previous premium level,” noted Hank Ramsey, Vice President of Life Product Strategy for Prudential.
This little cutie is "Custard," and she's from the "Home Grown" collection of Sugar Nellie stamps! You can find "Custard" HERE at Funky Kits! Here's another view with a peek at the sentiment . . .
she loves to take a shower
For every one of these 19 years, in this same week, Blowfish gets sick.
-Ask for pics of my brain
In my senior year of high school I took a class in play production. It was a lot of fun, and I got to sit in a trash can and go blind in Christopher Durang's The Actor's Nightmare.
“When you’re making temporal work, you have to just let it die,” said Faler. “It’s not always about the potential of dying. Being a sculptor, especially at a young age, you come to terms with putting a lot of your stuff in a dumpster. It is what it is. You have to balance it out with something that sustain time like photography and drawing and things of that nature, but it all balances out.”
And here are a few verses that remind me that I can depend upon Him… I particularly like this first one…
3. Good food. As I journey down this road to a healthier lifestyle, I am rediscovering old favourites and discovering some new favourites, luscious soups, crispy stir fries, curried beans with vegetables and something as simple as a date with a dollop of fresh goat cheese and an almond slipped inside like a little treasure waiting to be found.
At some point, just about everyone contracts the virus of self-doubt. Sometimes we beast the sickness as quickly as it arrives, sometimes the self-doubt lingers for weeks. And I know we all have our own ways of battling bouts with self-doubt.
What I would really, REALLY like for this giveaway is something beautiful. I'd love to see pictures that mean spring or poems or something incredibly CUTE that will take my mind off this dumb... whatever-it-is that's fogging up my bring this week.
Before going to Build a Green Bakery, a minute eco-friendly spot in the East Village, it’s worth visiting their web site. Buildagreenbakery.com explains how the floor is cork, the walls are colored with milk paint (“We’re a bakery, what could make more sense?”), and both the cash register and light fixture are throwbacks to previous generations. In short, it’s a “green” business. But it’s quite clear the cookies, made with certified organic flour and other natural ingredients, don’t suffer for the principles.
I've not been able to do much with Bay Girl over the past week (see above), but what I have done has been very successful. She continues to be easy to catch, and approaches the gate every time I come up. Yes! My boss reported to me that she also walked right up to her when it was time to catch her and bring her in for a rainy night. Double success!
Deep Purple- Highway Star (Made In Japan LP- 1972)
It will be OK though. All the in-law's survived and I still got to enjoy the sheer pleasure of public humiliation on the part of those I have married into.
—Mark Caskie
Our main character (who doesn't have a name until about 1/2 way through) is human -- otherwise known as a heper. The world is now populated with "people" who are vampires. Gene (the name of the main character) has lived hidden among the vampires, pretending to be one of them, risking his life every day for his whole life.
I'm not blubber-dripping-off-the-bones fat - I carry the weight well, I think - but I've spent my entire adult life, so far, between 60 and 70 pounds overweight. That's enough to fit the medical definition of obesity, though I'm not what you think of when you think of obese. As I wrote, I've got a big frame and I carry the weight well, and most people don't realize that the medical definition of obesity starts at a much lighter weight than the conventional definition. That said, I am at the point where health problems like heart disease, diabetes, cancer, and potentially even dementia await me in the future if I don't make a change in my life style.
More updates after the weekend I should think, after a flying visit to London. There is nothing quite like London Fashion Week to encourage patriotism (okay, bunting-clad Royal Weddings street parties and Northern boozers are up there too..) and have me rubbing my hands together in anticipation of what the young british designers will come up with. For this reason Lulu Kennedy's blog is always good for a little peruse to the heart beating faster.
HEIMBERGER T, CHANG HG, SHAIKH M, CROTTY L, MORSE D, BIRKHEAD G. Knowledge and attitudes of healthcare workers about influenza: why are they not getting vaccinated? Infect Control Hosp Epidemiol 1995; 16: 412-415.
Speaking of fast fashion, practically everything else I'm wearing came from F21. I placed a big ol' springtime order a couple weeks ago, and so far I have been really happy with everything I got! These jeans were meant to be cropped, but they fit me just right. I love the zippered ankles, and what you can't see here is that they are actually high waisted! The sweater is really lovely. The quality of the material is right up there with things I longingly fondle at Nordstrom and Anthro, and I love the woven embellishment and swingy silhouette. You can't see much of the little blouse underneath, because it is a tad chilly for chiffon, but fret not, I will be clubbing you over the eyeballs with it all summer, because it is the epitome of blue and white tribal print racerback asymmetrical ruffled perfection.
All the white horses have gone ahead
The Centre for the Study of Education and Work (CSEW) brings together educators from university, union, and community settings to understand and enrich the often-undervalued informal and formal learning of working people. We develop research and teaching programs at the Ontario Institute for Studies in Education (UofT) that strengthen feminist, anti-racist, labour movement, and working-class perspectives on learning and work.
Makes No sense whatsoever, right? Welcome to the world of the writer. I can’t really explain how much of myself I put into my writing, but it’s more than a pound of flesh. Self-insertion is one of the deadly sins of writing, but does that still apply if EVERY SINGLE character in the story is you? Writing is for the bipolar, for those who can’t make up their minds and for those who are never satisfied with “just because” as an answer. Every writer I’ve come across is out of their damn mind and I am head over heels in love with them all—a bunch of head cases roaming the streets among the masses. Why do you think so many writers drink and do drugs? To quiet the voices, to put the demon to sleep.
"If you don't have anything going on this afternoon we could go sit by the pool back at the hotel or hang out in my room," I suggested.
I'm open to suggestions. We're based about 40 minutes north of downtown Houston.
In groups of three students either improvise or plan a death in 30 seconds. Other students play the detective and figure out whether the death was natural or murder, and what evidence could be used to decide. Depending on the class, scenario cards can be given to groups to scaffold the activity.
feeding on the crowberry barrens,
“Early Bird catches the ‘Warm’”
Adamson rocked back in his chair, continually impressed by American ergonomics, thinking that right about now might be a good moment to consider retirement. He could go out on a high, having played a major role in foiling an international conspiracy. Hell, he’d probably even get a medal of some description. He could almost picture himself at Windsor Castle, waiting in line to receive a gong from the Queen. DI Hawthorne would be able to watch it on telly. The thought of it made Adamson grin like a madman.
We involve our children as much as we can in our lives because they are the biggest and best part of said lives. We witness daily that this instills a sense of moral compass, objectivity, confidence, and a comfort speaking their voice.
One day I climbed an elm tree to procure some bark; while about fifteen feet from the ground, the limb upon which I stood, being dry, broke, and I fell to the ground upon my back. The accident apparently knocked the breath out of my body. A cousin ran to the house and told my parents that I was dead, but before my friends reached me I revived, rose to my feet, and met them on the way.”
Unroll the pie dough onto a foiled lined baking sheet that has been sprayed with nonstick cooking spray.
Occasionally I am lucky enough to read a book that grabs me from the very beginning, and then stays with me. That haunts me for days after I read the final page. Sometimes it is because the story is so entertaining, and so well written, that I am captivated by it, drawn into it, entranced. Sometimes a book makes me think differently; it opens me up to new ideas. It makes me question myself, and pushes me to do better, be better. And sometimes it is because I can relate so deeply to the story, or the message, or the authors sense of humor, that I want to meet them and say "Wow, you really get it. Will you be my friend"
Austria
So, we didn't venture out anywhere.
Sex — of any kind, whether we’re talking about intercourse, oral sex, manual sex, masturbation, or any other sex — not only doesn’t feel the same way for all people, it often doesn’t even feel the same way for one person from day-to-day, partner to partner, or activity to activity.
So I went back to the pharmacy and asked them If they would at least refund me the $40 z-pack that I was wrongfully prescribed, but because I had opened it they wouldn't take it back. I reminded them I wouldn't have opened it if the doctor wouldn't have told me to get it when I didn't need it in the first place.
Repeat to make the second matching earring.
Format:
2. While oil is heating, make the batter by whisking together flour, baking powder, and salt in a medium bowl. In a separate bowl, whisk flax seed and water together until thick, and then whisk flax mixture into the soy milk. Whisk wet into dry ingredients. Add more liquid or flour as needed. The goal is a thick pancake batter consistency--not too thick, but not so thin that it drips right off the balls.
Either way, it’s always fun when you have someone with whom you can motor, who also is game to play dress up in the middle of your work day.
For three days only, Sydneysiders will be able to enjoy a tasting plate of three or four Malaysian dishes for only $10, dining al fresco for a weekday lunch or dinner.
I lurve it!
“Remember the old translation of the Our Father? In place of “and lead us not into temptation,” we used to say, “and do not put us to the test.” What is the test? We’re telling God something like, “God, in my life I know you can test me the way you tested Jesus. I know you can make me sweat blood, but cut me a little slack. Make these things a little easier for me in my life so I don’t have to taste that complete darkness.” See, though, that darkness is the test of the moral athlete, inside of our moral loneliness. It’s not the test of our physical capacity to withstand pain.
Jo and JoJo for obvious reasons. An old friend who owned a record store in Hyannis dubbed me 'Nitro' because I have a short temper. My squeeze called me Shorty and Blondie when we were in high school, and now calls me Baby and Cindy Lou Who (he has other nicknames for me but those are all you are getting).
Despite the obvious dangers, between the ages of 15 and 20 Becky met 40 men — strangers, ranging from teenagers to married men in their late 40s — for sex in often risky situations. Becky, who lives near Exeter with her widowed mother, a childminder, says: ‘We’d check into cheap hotels, or they’d drive me somewhere and we’d have sex in the car. The men were always in charge, they’d obviously been watching a lot of porn and would ask me to replicate things they’d seen in videos. ‘The sex was awful, they never asked me if I enjoyed it — and I never saw them again.
What did the disciples fear? The Jews could have arrested them as being guilty by association with the crucified Jesus. They, too, may have been sought in connection with His ‘crimes’.
He emailed me right away and said: "Honey, have you heard of Dragonfly Cakes? We received a box of these petit fours at the office today. It was really good, you'll like it... also good gift idea for brides."
to see Andre in the chair
A: No. But being a perennial student of fashion and working with a set of instructions over 50 years old is nothing short of, like WOW, so totally awesome! For me, vintage patterns offer up an experience about as close to to time travel as I'm ever going to get. These are the images I grew up with . . . sewing patterns from the 1950s-60s. Moms and grandmas back then more often than not owned a sewing machine they actually put some wear and tear on. These patterns were inspiration points for me; the models in the illustrations looking like something you’d find on an episode of Mad Men. I never forgot those nipped in waistlines and yards of skirt, collecting an array of 50s chic as well as patterns through the years. Here are a few things I learned along the way working with vintage patterns:
However, like absolute idiots, we did close to nothing to let you, our lovely, patient and good-smelling customers know which was which.
1 cup frozen peas , thawed
78. Be more diligent in tracking my food intake.
Could I live there? I don't think so. Maybe. I think that mash of people would send me insane.
So I don't doubt that Pippa is going through a hard time now but she is probably the luckiest girl in the world - her sister, Kate, has done all the hard work (marrying a Prince) and Pippa just reaps all the benefits because who wouldn't want those royal connections...? Pippa will easily find a suitable husband - someone with even more money and with some luck also a title almost as grand as her sister's (she could manage Duchess but never Princess or Queen!).
Coz this is our moment
May & Walsh didn’t really need ‘good luck’ they blew through the field like Tropical Storm Fay in Florida. For the second straight olympics they didn’t drop a set. Incredible! At the games of the 29th Olympiad they extended their winning streak to 108 matches. Combined with the fact, they achieved history under the ever watchful eye of paparazzi & American media. We all know how tough that can be!
I might add a few words about that mall before I go, the mall at which I would purchase these cheap fusion records. When I wasn't in the record shoppe I would be in a bookstore usually the Book Shack or Doubleday. It was in Doubleday the bookstore that I befriended an African American man named Lenny and he would tell me all about his philosophy of "Hedonism" which, he explained, in the vernacular meant "if it feels good do it!" but in philosophic language had to do with pleasure and pain and a man named John Stuart Mill. I would call him Lenny, the Hedonist. And he would remind me to be careful what I called other people in public.
(Al-Anfal 8:24)
The answer in the street is always "No". Can I ask you something? No. Do you have a cigarette? No. Can you tell me what time it is? No. The answer is always "No". Don't be nice. Stop the encounter as soon as it starts.
1984
The afternoon was moving towards 4:00pm and while the sun had been beating down fiercely the entire day, clouds rolled in from the Pacific Ocean and covered up Sol. As the shadows disappeared from the bleachers and the lack of direct sunlight caused the heat of the day to alleviate, a mother in the seats above me nudged her daughter and said, “Necessitas un chompa. Tengo frio.” (You need a sweater. I’m cold.)
James "I don't know."
Romney Used To Portray Himself As An Avid Sportsman, Claiming He Was A "Hunter Pretty Much All My Life." "When asked at public forums about his stance on guns, Mr. Romney portrayed himself as a sportsman, a 'hunter pretty much all my life,' who strongly supported the right to bear arms. He recalled how he had gone hunting with his cousins as a teenager. The last time he went hunting, he said, was last year, when he shot quail in Georgia and 'knocked down quite a few birds.' 'So I've been pretty much hunting all my life,' he said again." (The New York Times, 12/22/07)
Ready? Ready. To enter the giveaway, leave a comment on this post. Tell me your favorite veggie, what burger recipe in the book you would make first, or anything at all. This giveaway is open to US residents only, but others this month will be open to everybody everywhere. The winner will be chosen by a random number generator and posted tomorrow below tomorrow's giveaway. If you win a giveaway on this blog at some point this month, please be kind and don't enter further giveaways--I'd love as many people to win something as possible!
By Indika Sri Aravinda
My fourth post will deal with the three stories that focus on “public life”: “Ivy Day in the Committee Room,” “A Mother,” and “Grace.”
Interviewer: Should a man be punished for having homosexual tendencies?
That’s right this is the RANT-Tastic episode! On this episode we rant about:
- the way your face lights up and you giddily giggle when you see candy
* Jack says Adam and Eve's bodies (which are laid to rest in separate alcoves in the cave) are about 40-50 years old because of his estimation of the decomposition of their clothing. Yet in Across the Sea Jacob is shown laying "mother" and his brother to rest in the same alcove and we're led to believe this moment in time to be somewhere approximately (up to) 2000 years in the past. So logically you must think...Was it really 2000 or even 50 years? It doesn't matter.
First Rating: 9
I made a few changes to the recipe listed which I will post with an asterisk mark if you want to make it exactly as directed in magazine.
As I envisioned this poignant scene in which she connects with her true self, I cried. I cried because a longing to paint welled up deep inside of me until my emotions could not contain the force. I cried because I longed to paint, to create, in my own art studio where I can develop as an artist. As I wept, I imagined a time when nothing else would matter, when I entered my studio and brushed paint across the canvas. READ THE ENTIRE POST…
Imam Steve Rockwell does not like Ezra Levant sharing some Mohammed Cartoons on the Sun TV's The Source, aired today on the launch of the new channel.
Soon after Jen left, my mum appeared and helped to finish off the remaining cake. Well a girl can't eat all the cake on her own now can she!
Michael Ludwig (violin); Roman Mekinulov (cello); Ya-Fei Chuang (piano)
returning always
Furthermore, should you ever have a chance to visit the library, do so! Here are some photos I snapped when SOTS met at Cambridge in 2009 and we were treated to a private lecture at the Unit as well as a tour of many of the manuscripts which had been laid out for us:
In a week that has been absolutely heaving with copyright rulings from the British courts, the IPKat now brings you NewsBin 2, courtesy of Mr Justice Arnold of the Chancery Division, England and Wales. If you remember NewzBin I, just scroll down to the heading NewzBin 2 below.
I cannot stop the health
“No clothes, no shelter,” the Russian points out. “They have only an apple to eat, and they’re being told this is paradise. They are Russian.”
Marissa
—from Coma
“By restricting access to grazing land, for example, land and related feed resources become relatively scarce, so technical change will move towards making more efficient use of these resources …”
A fragment of the hilarious: the "stolen" dirt was taken by my younger son. I suspected him, but my older son, who was home all day, said that N. hadn't been by. I guess he did a drive-by. Grabbed the dirt and ran! Ha. He's already planted carrots, and has plans for a white peach tree in a big barrel.
I see my therapist today, and he is often a calm port in the storm for me. He offers a place to reflect on the busyness, the trials and tribulations of life. And things have certainly felt like they were moving quickly this week, as I have put a new project into place for work, including website and social media publicity.
Always enjoying respectful and friend competition over the last 20 years, the decision to join forces was a no brainer. The Stop Over Store has provided exemplary customer service through their three stores and superior web presence. Stop Over Store comes with a most knowledgeable staff servicing our airline industry since the mid 1980′s.
The effects of immigration on the total output and income of the U.S. economy can be studied by comparing output per worker and employment in states that have had large immigrant inflows with data from states that have few new foreign-born workers. Statistical analysis of state-level data shows that immigrants expand the economy’s productive capacity by stimulating investment and promoting specialization. This produces efficiency gains and boosts income per worker. At the same time, evidence is scant that immigrants diminish the employment opportunities of U.S.-born workers.
So...mommas...my lesson learned....teach yourself before the kids. I apparently lost my mind somewhere as I was labeling that box. I don't know WHAT happened to the giveaway. The labels were right. I live in hick ville so maybe I need to have literally write TO: and FROM:
Then it used more energy to go not up, but down, struggling to send a tiny little root through that compacted mud — that terribly icky place. It needed something to tightly hold on to, because……..
My little treat for you on this Halloween is free shipping of all US and Canada orders.
I goes, “Ha ha,” my fine NWO laddies! Did you do a ritual and rape a virgin before setting that nasty little bomb off?
Ian blows air through his teeth, winding up. My twin brother is not among those who fear the solarrivum. He anxiously anticipates the annual blaze of sunlight, craves the insanity it evokes.
A lady going to work off shore as a paramedic and could I include and oil rig?
Tyrion is playing games with the small Council again, not only did he save Sansa from Joffrey and send the prostitutes to his nephew, but he has sent Lord baelish to the Stormlands, where he confesses his love for Catelyn Stark and returns her husbands body to her with the offer of trading her daughters for Jamie Lannister. Tyrion also discovers the fact that his sister is sleeping with the King’s squire and, in return for information, agrees not to tell Joffrey. Tyrion is playing a dangerous game, but seems to be winning… For now.
But until then,
I don't know if this pairing of letters was intentional or not but the connection is clear, lost only to those whose wilful ignorance on the immigration issue makes them blind to it: high immigration and youth unemployment are related. If unemployment is high among Canada's young it is likely due to them being driven out of the job market by immigrants. Or, if Canada's educated young are having a hard time finding adequate employment, what is the likelihood that immigrants - the majority of whom hail from the developing world - will be more successful? To put it another way, if there are no jobs for Canada's young then there are no jobs for immigrants.
In the garden I am harvesting the odd beans, baby tomatoes and courgettes as well as spinach
3 Pearls are from Martha Stuart
The healthy upgrade system is a blast. Players can pick and choose how to improve their protagonists, boosting fighting styles, physical traits and inventory perks. Weapons and armor can also be honed with enough money and raw materials, giving each gun the potential to become an unstoppable zombie-shredder. Trying to upgrade a piece of equipment several levels at once, however, requires navigating the same tedious dialogue and menu options with each step up the ladder.
"You like it? It's yours."
(And why do I keep putting the verb “to be”, selectively, in strike-through text? But that, dear readers, will have to wait for another day.)
8) Wear a genuine smile (A cheerful look brings joy to the heart. Proverbs 15:30)
Or perhaps its the way that Cyclops makes subjective opinions look like hard facts - causing those who disagree with the data to feel like they're experiencing the drink incorrectly. Even the name 'Cyclops' conjures up an image of some omnipotent, infallible machine.
Being a Democrat in the 1830s meant a marraige between the Jacksonian wealthy and a powerful Irish working-class, strange bed-fellows often culminating in disaster. At a New Years eve celebration at the mayor's home in 1837, supporters stormed the doors, turning the home into a 'Five Points tavern' by one account. The police were summoned in an effort to clear away the mayor's own supporters!
He started to apologize, said he didn’t realize I was Arab. He just saw the passport, he said.
Measuring spoon
The University is leasing the space at a fixed, flat rate regardless of whether the space is filled with students or empty.
UPDATE–March 29, 2012
‘Hay(na)ku’ say napowrimo, ‘is a verse form similar to the haiku, invented by Eileen Tabios. The hay(na)ku form is pretty easy. Each hay(na)ku contains three lines. The first line has one word, the second line has two words, and the third line has three words. You can chain hay(na)ku together into multi-verse poems’.
what this means
I feel the day is successful (and sufficient) because I am keeping my word. It is successful (and sufficient) right now because I am sitting with my dear friend (who is not moving to anywhere) in silence (because we are working) and I feel comforted and at peace. I pray that my presence is a source of comfort and peace for her, as well.
Is there another way I could work better?
I have been delighted by each and every one.
In America, religion is relatively nonmystical. Religious teachers here are predominantly good, healthy materialists. They follow common sense. … The majority of religious people in this country do not accept on faith the idea of jumping into a cannibal’s pot and giving away their last shirt to the backward people of the world. Many religious leaders preach this today, because of their own leftist politics; it’s not inherent in being religious.
Lately I've been really into The Black Keys album "Brothers", Jessica Lee Mayfield "Tell Me", The Felice Brothers "Celebration Florida", John Howie Jr. & The Rosewood Bluff "Leaving Yesterday", Gillian Welch "The Harrow & The Harvest", The Gaslight Anthem "American Slang."
- Phalate-free certified natural fragrance
A sparkling table was set in the middle of the room.
AKE has published its latest intelligence report on Russia. The new quarterly product is designed to provide informed analysis and projections on developments in Russia’s business and political environment.
I shift from leg to leg, rub my sore back, crane my neck to see if the Virgin is in sight yet. I think about Christ’s imploring eyes and wonder why I’m here. The trumpet thankfully interrupts, the drum beats again, brum brum, brum bum bum. A distant bell rings and the Nazarenos angle their candles towards each other forming a medieval-like arch over the street, they resume their silent shuffle. A slight hint of incense tickles my nose, the steady clanking of the swaying palio, (the canopy suspended over the statue) becomes clearer, flickering flames and the mourning Virgin finally appear in the distance above the white peaks. The second band, accompanying the Virgin, now marks the beat that the procession follows, sometimes slow and sorrowful, other times swift and exultant, but always steady and familiar. The costaleros (the men who carry the throne throughout the streets) sway the paso, gently rock it, inch it along or march it forward according to the music. The more frequently and elaborately they do this, the more the crowd applauds them. It is in hopes of seeing this spectacle that I wait so long for the Virgin to pass this corner I have staked as mine.
Intercom: “Are you guys ready to order now?”
10 – Lockout – £169.133 – £1.075.002
In other news, I had a long and busy day at work today. I started the day visiting a perfectly lovely little gift shop in Mill Creek. They run our software and they like it, so they let us come and observe sometimes. Actually, I got to do more than observe. I probably can't put it on a resume, but I now have some experience ringing up sales and receiving inventory.
We recently extended the board and batten into our kitchen desk area. I will be revealing the finished area in a few posts after I show some of the projects that it involved. Today I'm showing how I took two cereal boxes and turned them into a cute way to deal with your paper piles.
Upon first glance, this looks like a violet glitter. As you can see, there are many different colors of glitter mixed in but the majority of the glitter is violet. I see red, green, blue, pink, and yellow pieces of glitter swirling around adding more interest, texture, and playfulness to this beauty. I used two coats of Full Spectrum on each finger and one coat of black polish on my index and middle finger.
To vote, just click on the link below. You must sign in or register with Goodreads to vote as well. But that shouldn't matter... us book lovers should already have an account on Goodreads right? LOL.
He still looks like the kid in Charlie and the Chocolate Factory. But, then, he probably feels like the kid in Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, with all the records he's selling lately.
My lovely Desigual dress (last seen here). I bought this in London, England, about 2 years ago, in May 2010. Coincidentally, Megan of The Fashionable Bureaucrat has the exact same dress! Check it out here. What I find funny is that she got hers in Paris. Two Canadian gals, on opposite sides of the country, both went to Europe and bought the same dress. Bizarre!
“The AMLC has the power to open bank accounts and to initiate an investigation. But publicizing the investigation and releasing the results require many procedures. Those procedures were not followed,” Marcos noted.
These five categories do not comprise Calvinism in totality. They simply represent some of its main points.
Next morning discard the lemongrass and basil leaves and churn according to manufacturer's directions for about 20 minutes and freeze for at least a few hours before serving.
What shall we say, then? Shall we go on sinning so that grace may increase? By no means! We are those who have died to sin; how can we live in it any longer? Or don’t you know that all of us who were baptized into Christ Jesus were baptized into his death? We were therefore buried with him through baptism into death in order that, just as Christ was raised from the dead through the glory of the Father, we too may live a new life. – Paul, Romans 6:1-4 (TNIV).
I also love the work of Piero di Cosimo, whose fantastic painting of Perseus rescuing Andromeda from a horrible monster really inspired me! I could imagine walking into any of these paintings and having a closer look around.
3) Have Miles and Dexter learn their individual names before graduating High School.
We had dinner here at my home and my husband's family + a young couple from church joined us. I was very pleased with how my meal turned out.
This next component is one that we saw in a lot of other Rube Goldberg machines. The goal is to transfer movement from low to high using ramps, balls, and levers. Each ramp allows the ball to roll down and into a lever; the lever transfers the motion upwards to the next ramp.
It's going to be an incredible ride. I promise!
of the truth eternally ~
I think it's really cute that the spinach floated to the top and left the egg and feta cheese at the bottom. : )
I had a mountain of paperwork to do this afternoon and she was happily in the same room with me, fixated on her Playmobil animals. She’s always liked little things like these and the Playmobil people to carry around and hold.
white sheets fresh off the clothesline
Work on Grace motifs, I’m hoping to have enough yarn for a small asymetrical shaped scarf
(Klaus Weiss, 1981)
From Hempenstein, an old college pal of mine, who recommends Mclelland’s Islay as “very smooth and an exceptional value”:
I now have complete control of my life
ABOUT JOE’S JEANS INC.
He spun, but so nothing.
So on Tuesday, you read HERE all that is stirring in my heart. I didn't intend to be a Debbie Downer, but after sitting on it a couple days, I am thinking, "Oofduh! Was I spirit squelcher, leaving you feeling heavy and burdened?"
That is inventive enough, but it did not stop there. They took another scoop and jammed it into the bottom of the same tube. Now they had a small slit at the bottom for the pellets to exit. The pellets actually flew out like they were coming out of a hopper.
“I told you before not to be so rough with her, she’s only a baby. Why did you push her down on the floor?”
What I don’t get is why the older brother has already given up. I mean, he actually got into the second exam and all. He might think that he doesn’t have much of a chance with people like Kenji and Serika out there, but the way he talks makes it sound like he already lost. It feels pretty weird how the two brothers are acting now, like they’re fighting all the time. I guess it’s hard being honest with each other right away. Both of them have a valid point: Mutta is only known as Hibito’s older brother (see what I did up till now? ;D), but he gave up halfway.
I keep my punches that I always use to hand in these tier containers ( for UK people I bought these at 'The Range' for £4.99)...the ones that I do not use that often are kept in the unit that my cameo sits on...that basket unit holds extra punches, printer stuff, cables ( boring )
If a Kaiju is in contact with a ship it will attempt to crush and eat it rather than use its fire-breath. Roll 1D6 and add one to the roll – this is the number of ‘r’ hits scored on the vessel. In addition a critical hit is automatically scored. The ship is considered grappled and unable to move until the Kaiju is forced to retreat or the ship is
The rest of that column called attention to a Boston Herald editorial by Daniel Akst, but he isn’t the only guy on the internet committed to standing up for the rights of sex workers, and today I’d like to call attention to a few others. I’m not going to include male sex workers (because it’s personal for them) or bloggers (unless they blog under their real names); these men are all journalists, academics, entertainers or government figures who have attracted my attention in the past two years. I’m sure I’m missing a few, so please feel free to add them in the comments (with a link and capsule biography, s’il vous plaît).
i always tell myself not to try new dishes when i invite friends over for dinner.. but i still do. sometimes they turn out really good, other times they don't. tan and i have been wanting to try homemade sushi so i watched a few youtube tutorials, grabbed some recipes online, and figured i knew what i was doing.
January 2008
Stereotypes. They should come with a warning.
A scary aspect of this bill is that it allows a company to block or modify your communication.
I want to thank everyone for all the sweet comments that you leave on the FWF posts.
Nurminen T. Female noise exposure, shift work, and reproduction. J Occup Environ Med 1995; 37: 945-950.
Echo(cardiogram)...
Here I am on a Saturday night playing with my silhouette. Kids are in bed, DH is killing things in Star Wars, and I'm experimenting with my silhouette. After reading the silhouette blog the other day, I realized what the control panel shape was for. I made mine from one of my fav papers. Makes me think of spring. Hope everyone has a great weekend.
If you don’t require a 24 hour, 7 days a week connection to the net, then this is the least technical precaution you can take- by simply switching off the router. Having someone use the bandwidth you pay for, without your permission is indeed troubling, but coming home from a business trip or holiday to discover this, is downright cringe worthy!
Then my amazing cousin, Katrina, came online. I didn't intend to bring up all my emotional problems while we chatted, but those things just come out when you trust someone. She let me rant, giving me advice but not forcing me to take it. I left the conversation feeling only slightly better, thinking there was at least one person in the world that cared about me. But I still felt like this whole trying-to-get-published thing was a waste of my time.
As in the flower. I hate the way they look. I REALLY REALLY HATE the way they smell. I know lots of people find it to be a pleasant flowery sort of scent, but when I smell lilies I immediately think of dead people. Specifically, dead relatives who should not have died at age 19. Sure there are a few other flowers I don't really like that much--irises, impatiens, tulips--but if someone happened to bring me a bouquet of those I would politely accept it and put the flowers in a vase in the kitchen.
I must have been a good mommy because they are both sleeping soundly long enough for me to post this update. ( knock on wood)
Now go forth, and read something by Tolkien!
6A. Sex, Drugs, and Rock ‘n’ Roll. – TEL 236
Also candy plays an important role often mixed with kruidnoten/pepernoten generously handed out by the Zwarte Pieten, as well as mandarin oranges.
While I’m at it, I figured I might as well begin my first confession. My house is a wreck. For seven years I worked outside the house, and pretty much all I did was sleep, eat, work, and go doctors. Really. So…. it’s taken a toll on my house.
I only watched one of the several Schizoid videos featured on this guy's youtube page. I saw some faces I recognized. You probably will too. Just noticed there's a clip of them doing an RKL cover. Rad.
December 18, 2009 — Judge Stan Strickland denies a request to take the death penalty off of the table in the prosecution of Casey Anthony.
There are many in this old world of ours who hold that things break about even for all of us. I have observed for example that we all get the same amount of ice.
Iván Meade – "What is your favourite design find? Where did you get this item – how long have you had it?"
Enjoy and a Very Merry Christmas & Happy New Year to All of You!!!
Expand your poker knowledge with this course about stack sizes, position play, bluffing and even more bankroll management.
Ok, so perhaps that is slightly exaggerated, but I feel like because this was an unexpected day home I shouldn't feel obligated to do anything.
The first season was actually really good, and seemed to have a larger budget for outdoor shooting, which made the whole show seem more expansive. There’s also absolutely nothing wrong with Agent Dale Cooper and his quirky approach to investigation techniques. He’s actually the only reason we kept watching as long as we did.
La Dame de Monsoreau (1846) (a.k.a. Chicot the Jester)
Sport Shouldn’t Matter
And I got to move on with what I keep inside
We have been in this situation before during the seventeenth century civil war, when the nation was bitterly divided between religious factions. And the strength of the West derives from the time when it learned to tame religion. When the Church had monopoly power it was inclined to impose superstitions, carry out persecutions, and suppress the growth of any knowledge that contradicted church teaching. Yet belonging to moral communities inspired by religious faith has also been one of the strengths of the West. In England the turning point was in 1688/89 when religious toleration allowed the advantages of faith to be combined with the benefits of pluralism. The constitutional settlement of that time allowed people who disagreed strongly about the right way to live nevertheless to get along with each other without violence. In other words, our system was built on the expectation that there would be disagreements. Indeed, they were welcomed within limits. But, violence was ruled out and so was intolerance.
As soon as the composition in the plan is set up, the next thing is to do business with a financial consultant to distinguish existing possessions along with identify financial goals. Space between your assets by now in position and medium- to long-term objectives is where monetary arranging is available in.
She waited.
Wild Greens*
POSTED BY SONNY COX AT 12:24 AM
He said that HRT has certified about 5.2 billion barrels of potential reserves.
Thursday, Holmes began telling us about British Major-General Orde Charles Wingate and the substantial successes of his special forces in Africa and the British Mandate of Palestine. Today, we learn how Wingate put his revolutionary methods to use against the Japanese in WWII.
The best advice we have ever been given when it comes to allotments is ‘little and often’, that is to say if you can get a job done here and there on a regular basis then progress WILL be made. The last month has been all about that given the rain and this weekend was no exception.
And…LOOK for a NEW LINK LIST TOMORROW!!!
Wanting to know more isn't a new idea--otherwise there would be no sequels, no trilogies, no director's cuts, no bonus material. I'm totally guilty of this--if a story grabs me, I want to know everything. The first time I saw Lady Jane, a fantastic movie about Jane Grey, the Nine Days' Queen, I went in search of everything I could find out about her and her short-lived marriage because what was on the screen was great, but Not Enough. (And that's just one example. Some of my dives into Google and Wikipedia are pretty epic.)
May Arts Stripped Green and Cream Ribbon
And it was - Sue couldn't finish all of hers so I helped out - that's how good it was.
I used the 2011-2013 in-colors plus Cherry Cobbler.
“One of the goals of immigration is the revival of the duty of jihad and enforcement of power over the infidels. Immigration and jihad go together. One is the consequence of the other and dependent upon it. The continuance of the one is dependent upon the continuance of the other.”
kindhearted as a grandmother,
The next step was forgiveness. First, I had to forgive myself. Not because I bore any responsibility- but because I needed to recognize that I bore no responsibility. For me, forgiveness of self was my way of accepting that I was innocent and that I hadn't asked for it. It was how I came to terms with what had been done TO me.
A healthy body is just enough for everyday life but a fit body is one that can do even more. It is capable of
This paragraph is just an event without any context.
The pacing of this novel is spot on, and the setting is so gritty and real that you feel like you are there in Allison’s horrible world. The novel is action packed, moving you from one scene to the next seamlessly.
Massive trauma.
4) I also need to get ready for my trip to Florida and the Wonderful World of Harry Potter. I can't wait.
1 shoulder
So its been a while since I posted any news. Its been a busy time with good and bad events.
…Then I realized GW2 wasn’t going to make me buy arrows. Or bullets. I started switching weapons back and forth and you know what? I liked it. It helped me stay versatile while helping others in dynamic events. Five thieves? No problem. I’ll stand on the hill and pick off centaurs. I’m whatever
Gruen Nation
I became hyper aware of the rustling of leaves and pine needles, of each movement in the underbrush and each shift in the light. I filled in my sensory gaps with my imagination. Was it a person or a deer who walked behind the tent? Is someone shining a flashlight this way, or is it only the movement of clouds uncovering the moon?
Rethink your space by rotating furniture, artwork and decorative objects in your home. Add, take away and then add some more. Mixing periods, form and finishes can accomplish just the right balance you are trying to strike.
Yeah. That’s a good description of the way we write music; it’s about the feeling. We used to get a lot of slack about being a band like “oh, this is too simple, or there’s only note, maybe one or two changes...”
Three in our party of six all chose the Fettucine with Shrimp and Scallops in a Pesto sauce. Lots of rave reviews on this one with my wife insinuating the next night while enjoying what she brought home, that it may have been one of her best meals ever. No faint praise there.
Also, with Siri still being in beta, Apple can further conduct research in the data provided from Siri as to how this “personal assistant” is used to harness the collective intelligence of many users throughout the English spoken countries first, and then further its development into other languages later in its newer beta releases. This real time sampling of people’s usage of Siri allows continuous refinement and improvement of Siri in newer versions over time. To know more about the harnessing of collective intelligence, check out my other blog post regarding people using Flickr.
But answering machines use energy 24 hours a day, seven days a week. And when they break, they're just one more thing that goes into the landfill. If all answering machines in American homes were replaced by voice mail services, the annual energy savings would total nearly two billion kilowatt-hours - so when it breaks I'm switching to voicemail (another plus is no lost messages in a power outage).
Really trying to keep myself distracted. Lots of thoughts about hurting myself. How I can do it. How it will feel. What would be the results. Where will I do it on my body. Tops of my arms, my thighs. Feeling lonely and isolated. Don’t know what else I can do asides from curl up in bed and feel bad. Just jumped up. Turned my laptop back on. Writing.
Dear Nick
Maybe those historians will conclude that they weren't. Because as everybody knows, they think the biggest problem in the Middle East today is Israel's borders. Never mind that the Arab street has nothing to eat, no employment for its youth. Forget the fact that nearly every country is under the heel of a dictatorship or in transition to another one. That's secondary. The biggest priority of the age is to tame Israel and build windmills all over the landscape. Do you disagree? Well you don't count.
Maisa: (Trying to fight tears but can’t.) Ms. Anwaar…
I had to get a man out to look at my light today as Party Time in one of his Tarzan moods jumped off the stairs from halfway up caught hold of the light and tried to swing across the hall on it – or that's probably what he thought would happen in his cave-painting-rendered mind's eye, - but what he achieved in doing in the 3d dimensions was pull the light, the fitting, and a big square of plaster board down on top of himself. Now there is a big hole in the ceiling where a bat got through last night. I screamed the house down when I saw it. I am afraid of things that can fly. I screamed to Party Time, “Catch it! Catch it,” and he, the big mongoloid, gets his lead pellet rifle out from his sports bag and shoots after the thing, round and round and round the room in circles. I hit the deck and lil Gore Vidal, the cat, got a round right in the foot.
Life is a journey, an adventure that's filled with surprises. Sit back and enjoy the ride. It's not a race to see who gets to the finish line first. Remember, the one who dies with the most toys is still dead. So slow down, enjoy what you have, and take time to smell the roses along the way.
Regarding the bleeding, it is normal to bleed for several weeks after having a baby. Again, the bleeding quickly lessens and will often stop only to start again … it is not unusual to bleed on and off for somewhere between 2 – 6 weeks after having a baby.
Cut chicken wings into 3 sections, discard wing tips. Add hot sauce to the butter, olive oil and garlic, keep warm. Deep fry wings until desired shade of brown. Remove, drain on paper towels and place in medium bowl, cover with hot garlic sauce and serve.
Scrupulous and enthusiastic
IT'S THE KEY THING!
I laid them out over the living room floor hoping that inspiration would hit while my furry assistant assessed the collection.
“No Reason … I was just wondering.” Or maybe I was just ovulating.
But, like Toronto, public transit in Stockholm seems like a secondary mode of transit, one taken not as a last resort but merely to supplement the main mode of travel which, in Toronto, would be the automobile. In Stockholm, it’s on foot and bicycle.
AJ completely destroys Kaitlyn, and beats her with a swift kick to the head.
Anyway, thanks for reading. Hope you found this interesting. : )
This is great news - there is nothing worse than having to wait ages for payment. Now you know that when you receive notification of payment, your story will be in the next issue, and you haven't missed its publication. Well done TAB!
Her brother had a dream in his early twenties as well. When Matt finished university, he bought a road bike and began to ride further and further every day, pushing his legs, his mind and his body to go the distance. An idea began to take shape in his mind – to ride solo from northern Ontario across Canada to Vancouver, British Columbia. He talked to cycling friends, researched and bought the best equipment, planned his route and prepared for the trip. He didn’t tell me that there would be a 200 km isolated stretch across northern Ontario where he’d be completely out of cell phone range for at least two days. Nor did he mention the number of transport trucks that would blow him off non-existent shoulders of the TransCanada Highway and into the ditch. He also neglected to mention that he’d be riding against the prevailing winds (most cyclists ride west to east to have the wind behind them).
If you would like to purchase the picnic basket, just send me a note at theclassicbride@gmail.com with your zip code and I will get you a shipping quote. All final payments are accepted via PayPal.
“… and pigeons away,” she continued. “But I think it might also have repelled all birds, so that’s why I didn’t get it.”
Cale (April 2) and Sun Ra (May 5) both played around the same time (and I guess that she left Santa Cruz after that 1990 spring semester. (She now lives in Nashville.)
You see, I am the master of excuse-making.
“We need to strengthen cooperation on extraterritorial legal processes, share technical expertise and information, and act as a forum in which to continue discussions on effective ways to fight against terrorism.”
And the challenge this week is....
When we finally left the Tate, it was pouring. I went over to D’s flat for a bit where I had some ginger tea while D ate baguette and cheese. Then we watched My Drunk Kitchen (if you haven’t seen this DO IT) and some Feminist videos and chatted about intellectual things.
I guess I am stunned that there is significant – much less any – danger that a this bill could get thrown out based essentially on semantics. Because there is no doubt that Congress is constitutionally empowered to impose a tax, and there is likewise no question as to its ability to create a special break from that tax for people or institutions which act in a certain specified way. (Just ask the oil companies!)
Yesterday, I took my neighbor to a local produce stand. This couple has the most delicious produce. The man told us that he is 100 years old--and still going strong--doing all the planting, care and picking. Guess he could have been joking but I'm not sure. Any way, I bought about 4 pounds of butter beans and probably that much or more of yellow squash. I bought 2 jars of chow chow and a little over 3 pounds of shelled crowder peas--they are in the freezer already. The butter beans and squash were supper last night. Oh my----they were so good. When I was little, Ma-Maw cooked me a pot of butter beans each time I went to visit them--then she would send me home with ones she had put in the freezer. I think they are my most favorite food---ever. The family used to make fun of me when I was little because when Ma-Maw gave me my plate, my head went down and I didn't look up until all the beans were gone--and I ate them one at a time. That was when I was around 1 or 2!! Nothing better than ham hocks and butter beans!!! I think I may go back and get a bushel or so to put in the freezer. When I got home, I has to shell the beans--S came down and helped me. I was glad for the help otherwise, I may not have been done in time for supper!! Homer also gave me a lemon cucumber to try--I didn't have any but J and K said it was really good. It was cute--shaped like a lemon and the inside had 5 sections sort of like a lemon. He said to try it then come back and buy lots of them!!! Homer and his wife reminded me so much of my Ma-Maw and Pa-Paw. We--Anne and I had a really nice visit--an hour or more with Homer and Dot.
Before doing something or going somewhere, do you need to have a picture in your mind of what’s going to happen so as to be able to prepare
I just look at him. I respond, like you are a swimmer or a runner and shave your legs?
“Onset of adolescence, and all that,” the Pred mused aloud.
Recently, I had an interesting exchange with an editor that wanted to use my recipe for Meringue Pillows with Strawberries and Cream from Basic to Brilliant, Y’all in a non-food publication. We exchanged a few emails and I sent the recipe along — then she emailed me back, saying that it looked too hard.
Another one of my favorite gowns of the entire evening. Givenchy Haute Couture gown, stunning beading, and fits in with the white/nude trend. I love this gown. It's sophisticated. It sparkles. It has a bit of Greek Goddess going for it. The fitted bustier top is flattering on anyone. Definitely a hit with me!
for the August child, a blessing in one word
DRS was a new technology last year. We soon saw teams start to converge on a short chord flap and a high mounted hydraulic actuator pod. DRS allows the rear wing flap to open a gap of upto 50mm from the main plane below it. A smaller flap flattens out more completely with this 50mm gap, reducing drag more effectively than a larger flap.
You’ll never know
A few preachers have coupled this Scripture with Romans 9:15 and Romans 9:21-23 to prove that the fate of Judas was foreordained. We quote the verses in Romans 9, “For He saith to Moses, I will have mercy on whom I will have mercy, and I will have compassion on whom I will have com­passion (Romans 9:15). “Hath not the potter power over the clay, of the same lump to make one vessel unto honor, and another unto dishonor? What if God, willing to shew his wrath, and to make his power known, en­dured with much longsuffering the vessels of wrath fitted to destruction: And that he might make known the riches of his glory on the vessels of wrath fitted to destruction: And that he might make known the riches of his glory on the vessels of mercy, which he had afore prepared unto glory.” (Romans 9:21-23).
It doesn’t take much experience to discover that your mate will not always motivate your love. In fact, many times they will de-motivate it. More often than you’d like, it will seem difficult to find the inspiration to demonstrate your love. They may not even receive it when you try to express it. That’s simply the nature of life, even in fairly healthy marriages.
I got my haircut after work, and it was still light on the walk home. I adore this house and I'm so glad I got a picture of it in good light.
I always feel more in control if I have my house - and my life - organized. Last week, I spent several hours purging my pantry, fridge and freezer, removing nearly all of the gluten products. I couldn't believe how many products that entailed. Any unopened gluten products went to our local food pantry whereas half-opened boxes and jars headed next-door to our neighbor's house. We've had new next-door neighbors ever since this past summer, when Ring, Pocket and Posies moved about seven minutes away. We love our new neighbors - they are a Christian family with three young children ranging from ages five to 15 months.
Allthough my health issues are not good, I still have the delight pleasure to craft now and then.
2-13 Cross Crises In Lust Storm 5:24
4 crazy
Also...Chateau Vignelaure near Rians is making excellent wines...and so is Richaume in Puyloubier (Cotes de Provence), created by a cello-playing history professor and now run by his son.
So the sun stood still,
Don't:
Another sad split story. Nadine Coyle from Girls Aloud and her fiance Jason Bell have split after being engaged since September.
Unnamed farmer (30) (SAP withheld name) 20001012 killed, unnamed farm, Trichardtdal, MPL
Magnum: Lol. Got it the first time
News Conference to be held in Booth SL12805.
You can blog about my giveaway but it won't give you extra entry because I want to make this giveaway as simple as possible for you girls to join. A way of saying thank you for the endless support. If you do write a blog entry about this giveaway do leave me your blog link, I will link them up in the giveaway result post, even if you did not win :) To show I am really grateful for the entry and shout out :)
Petitioner’s convictions were affirmed on direct appeal by the Oklahoma Court of Criminal Appeals, although the court modified Petitioner’s death sentence on the murder charge to life imprisonment, holding that Oklahoma’s death penalty statute was unconstitutional. See Selsor v. State, 562 P.2d 926 (Okla.Crim.App.1977). In his direct appeal, Petitioner alleged, inter alia, that the trial court erred in failing to either grant a severance of his trial from Dodson’s trial or appoint separate counsel. Petitioner did not raise a double jeopardy issue in his direct appeal.
Today she offered her advice to a few listeners, including what to do with a wife that wants a huge celebration on every anniversary!
After getting pregnant again, it became clear to me that my hip issues were connected to other places where I have been experiencing pain. Back when I was pregnant with Belle, there was situation where I found myself 28 weeks pregnant with a resistant toddler just when I saw the bus we needed to get was pulling in across the street. The toddler (Willem) wouldn't walk and I didn't want to wait another 30 minutes with a tired, hungry toddler at the bus stop for the next bus. I grabbed him and ran. As a result, I pulled a ligament on my pubic bone. It was that ligament that caused me to stop participating in my Irish dance company because the weight of the pregnancy and the pain in that ligament was too much. My hip issues then started a few weeks later and continued intermittently. The ligament didn't give me any more trouble after Belle's birth--that is, until I got pregnant this third time. Its been bothering me more than my hip has the last few months.
for a baby boy but it really turned out to be boyish and not so much babyish.
Much Love and Respect!
There followed the long 45 minute walk (down hill all the way in the morning), a full day’s work and a very long walk back up a very long lonely hill, carrying heavy shopping bags in the evening before cooking a supper for the family and dealing with all the other items that come along with well, just having a family really: homework, clothes washing, (mum have got PE tomorrow and no kit) and the ubiquitous letter produced usually around bedtime requesting “Johnny” attend school tomorrow in Mexican fancy dress as we are learning about south american food – oh and if you could also supply a selection of Mexican food to snack on (no nuts) that would be greatly appreciated. You guessed it, more stress.
Roast Bendigo Squab with roast Congo (purple) Potato and Eggplant was next with the Goat’s iconic Hightail Ale complimenting the flavours and sweetness delightfully. Something of a surprise was the way in which the beer sliced through and yet complimented the smokiness of the paprika-laced eggplant. Tom and I nearly ‘did our necks’ we were nodding so furiously in agreement across the table.
AFSI members Bob Unger and Jack Ross (who had recently dedicated the Torah Scroll that was confiscated). David Jacobs now lives in Israel with his family and spoke of the anguish he felt seeing the synagogue destroyed (in Gush Katif) where his daughter held her Bat-Mitzvah.
But since Pakistan openly broke with Washington over the US military attack on two Pakistani border posts last November, the Pakistani military has more self-confidence. Under its new chief, Lt. Gen. Zaheer ul-Islam, the ISI has become more "proactive" in responding to negative press coverage, according to the officials who spoke with the Post. The ISI revelation to the Washington Post that ISI had turned over Khan's cell phone number to the CIA in November confirms the essence of the story Qadir obtained from his sources.
The pain from these thoughts almost doubled him over and he cursed himself for missing another dose of the white pills his mother sent him. And then with a jolt to his solar plexus he remembered the prescription he’d forgotten to pick up. The Ritalin. His mother would be upset that he hadn’t sent it. It had been ready two days ago and he’d completely spaced it out.
This is one afternoon after a thunderstorm on Flathead Lake. Big waves! We stayed at a friend's house there for our reunion. So that week I didn't accomplish much. But I did sell a lot of stuff to family. Made room for more stuff in the shop, that I don't have time to make. And then later in the month I socialized a few times with old high school friends and girlfriends. And then I discovered that I was low on pretty much every component I make myself so I had to make more. And then I had some custom work that I didn't show you. It's kind of in the same vein of what I've been doing and I didn't want to bore you. I was on a bead diet for a long time too, but I just broke that the other day so I'll show you that. How about we get to that right now?
I had to laugh, sadly. The Thomas Kinkade National Archives made me chortle with incredulity while simultaneously making my stomach turn. (It is a hope of mine that The Painter of Light will disappear into history with the passing of our generation. At least Disney tried to infuse his view of what our saccharine world should be with a bit of humor, and I can't even imagine Uncle Walt establishing his own National Archive in his own lifetime...but I digress.)
The 4002 is a wonderful FACP ( Fire Alarm Control Panel). I like it because of it's Marchtime peizo.
This isn’t the kind of blog post I meant to write after so much silence. I guess I just hope it’s the kind of post that you needed to read. Perhaps you, like me, tend to live in the Where You’re Going and forget to enjoy the Where You Are. And maybe you must always be moving forward, because getting what you want will always, must always, be a gradual process. I’m not even sure there is a What You Want, not that doesn’t morph once you’ve reached it.
I think that one of the reasons I have such difficulties in enjoying “MANSFIELD PARK” is that I found Austen’s portrayal of the roguish Henry Crawford rather uneven. He is originally portrayed as a ladies’ man who takes pleasure in seducing women. But after courting heroine Fanny Price, he falls genuinely in love with her and successfully manages to mend his ways. But Fanny’s rejection of him (due to her love of cousin Edmund Bertram) lead him to begin an affair with Edmund’s sister, Maria Rushworth and is labeled permanently by Austen as a reprobate. This entire storyline failed to alienate me toward Henry. I just felt sorry for him, because Fanny was not honest enough to reveal why she had rejected him. Here are the actors that portrayed Henry Crawford:
Two hours after the administration of the epidural (for which I could have kissed the doctor)the doctor came in and checked me. He said "Okay we are ready to push. This could take a while so slow and steady wins the race." I pushed, and the doctor put the nurse in charge while he ran across the hall to deliver another baby. With the next push the nurse asked me to STOP! She called for help and literally held the baby in until the doctor came running back into the room. He literally caught the baby as he ran in and he came out and handed him to the nurse. It was like something from a movie.
Nicknaming someone implies that you’re close enough to dispense with formalities. Sure, it can be patronizing. But it can also be a profound expression of affection. Among American men in particular, nicknames are often an ironic sign of respect. Giving another guy a moniker – be it “Otter” or “Snoop Dog” -- in a fraternal setting confers acceptance and camaraderie.
Another topic I may occasionally cover is health. I'm 5 feet 2 inches and hovering around 100lbs. It's taken me the last two years just to gain 10 pounds. Gaining weight is a struggle for me *yes be jealous*. So you would think I don't have much to worry about... just because I'm "small' doesn't mean I'm healthy.
The bags were found about a half-mile apart in the canal near Avocet Road and Carl Bolter Drive. The canal stretches between U.S. 441 and the Intracoastal Waterway and flows under almost every major north-south road in Palm Beach County. The water flows east or west, depending on the tides.
Seeing the little boy,
Whenever requested an autoresponder issue regarding if the group might review a brand new offer following the write, Tannenbaum basically, “I stated almost all I’ll state regarding their agreement. inch
And, they have done it their whole lives while never complaining that my career has kept them from playing youth sports, taking piano lessons, or cheer leading for their schools with their friends. To them, me coaching football was what WE did as a family. But, it shouldn't be that way.
1 bullied
True to our motto “Zeitgeist and Tradition”, we combine age-old values with innovation and new ideas. Especially in viticulture, we nurture these values by cultivating grapes in the steepest terraces to preserve the cultural landscape of the Mosel terraces. Our goal is to create quality-oriented wines while caring for the environment that our grapes grow in.
Crap......
I decided (to my husbands protests) to go all the way to the top with the wallpaper. My #1 reason is because her walls were pretty beat up and this covered all that mess so nicely. I also went further and added crown moulding.. well, this is where hubby had to tell me.
“Steve Murdock, the former Texas state demographer and current director of the Hobby Center for the Study of Texas, expects that things would not improve under the budget of a struggling infant nation.
5 large apples, appropriate kind for baking*
- St. John, New Brunswick, actually broke its all-time April record for warmth in March, with 25.4 degrees C.
And to you, dear reader, I pass on Redhead’s question: ”When and how did you first become a Science Fiction fan?”
One of the hardest things I’ve had to overcome as a writer is allowing for imperfection. The first draft is all about making a ton of mistakes and letting them remain mistakes. No matter the sting, those misspelled words, run-on sentences, and irrelevant passages must exist. And I must forgive myself for making every mistake, for every error is a means to a finished piece. All those imperfections that drive me batty need to breathe or the real story will never emerge.
But, to keep myself on schedule, I needed to enter a blog post for the day. And the morale of the lesson I have learned today is that I need to spend more time at home. I should have left my family's place after dinner so that I would have some time to clean up my house. I do not believe I will be able to get myself out of bed in the morning for church tomorrow, I am that beat. But perhaps I should make an extra effort because I could really use some of the Lord's help in getting my home in order. I am certainly falling short by myself.
she was appalled that toby had grown up on gravy train. (by that time, he wasn't eating much of anything--he was living on cocktail weiners, homemade irish stew, boiled chicken, and basically whatever the hell he wanted. but his demise is another story, for another time.)
You decide. I decide. It’s ours to decide.
“You gave an old woman a little moment of joy,” she said. “Thank you.”
Filmography
Products used; Birthday Princess from Sugar Nellie, Promarkers, Craftwork cards sentiment, Boofle 12x12 papers, Kars wooden flowers, Gems free with magazine, Dovecraft ribbon and Handstitching.
Please stop by and visit their site.
* Also, the song is SUPER corny. I mean, I'm a new Mom and even I think so.
After reading, we again discussed what plants "need" in order to grow. Children came up with the obvious basics - water, sun, dirt. This made it really fun to watch their excitement over their beans sprouting in the paper towels and baggies! Each small group tackled a different way of planting - in the baggies with the moist paper towels or in the soil. We then switched, allowing the children the opportunity to experience both planting styles.
So, how did we get it all there?
By the time Anita Leslie wrote a biography of her great aunt in 1969, a letter had surfaced that Jennie wrote to her mother on Jan. 9, 1888. It says, “Do you know that it is my birthday today? 34!!! I think for the future that I will not proclaim my age…” If there’s one person you can’t lie to about your age, it’s your mother.
The Gift made Rel’s eyes ache as he walked down to the door, and he stifled a yawn. Focussing on the door kept his attention off the strangeness at the corners of his vision, but he was used to it anyway; the slopes to either side, if glanced at carelessly, seemed to ripple, almost to flap like wings.
5 engine
6. Sent For You Yesterday
Kim Ki-young on Kim Ki-young (1997) 35 minutes
Cost so far: 68 gold
About an hour or so after I got there, I glanced in the parking lot and saw my ex boyfriend Jered walking up. I may have mentioned before that he played rugby with my brother, so I pretty much knew he'd be there, and had prepared myself. Funny thing is, he actually PLAYED on the team, and I didn't of course, but everyone preferred to hang out with me at the bar and took my side on the whole breakup. THAT's pretty damn cool if you ask me. He looked so out of place and uncomfortable, and Steph and I kept giggling about it all night. La-hooo, za-herrr.
1 (28 ounce) can diced tomatoes with garlic and olive oil
And I feel like it's this great, looming presence on the metaphorical horizon: waiting, the days counting down, their passage constantly reminding me of how old I'm soon going to be.
at
Jake and Ella are in love with the giant Rhinocerous Beetles that are everywhere up here. They find dead ones in boxes and create little bettle cities, lining them up and driving them around like matchbox cars...very funny. They also have become quite cosmopolitan, drinking babychinos every morning curtesy of our adoring staff and our "fancy" coffee machine.
Today’s the first day I can walk like a normal person.
TLDR Don’t Watch This: are you crazy?
Update: I have decided to keep the two together, My vintage loving self just could not take them apart! LOL
The word is getting out however. There are now academic conferences on the romance novel, books on romance (Beyond Heaving Bosoms by Sarah Wendell and Candy Tan), articles and web sites.These examples are only a small sampling of information on Romance. Romance Writers of America (RWA) is a national organization with over 10,000 members with local chapters across the US and online.
Pedestrian
“Toby Dammit” sequence from the triptych movie The Spirits of the Dead—in which some idiot had dubbed Terence Stamp’s beautiful voice into Italian (!), but is still a necro-licious cinematic headtrip. So to speak…
On the right newspapers draped over what looked like
After reading the above, I propose two hypothesis:
Jesus has
If you haven’t heard by now, Passion is taking a massive turn as we head into the future. At the heart of the shift is a sense of fresh calling that God has made unmistakably clear to Shelley and me over the past eighteen months or so. Though for many reasons it looked like we might never lead a local church, all that has changed as God has placed in our hearts a huge passion to do just that. So in the coming months, by the grace of God, we will be planting a Passion Church in Atlanta as a local expression of the Kingdom of God for our rapidly growing and diverse city as well as a base for our influence throughout the nation and world.
Definitely not your everyday Halloween collection. I can see a lot of these papers being used for non-Halloween related projects. I bet all of you damask lovers will be in heaven with this collection. ;)
Patrick Blanc is possibly France's most well known botanist and vertical garden designer - if nothing else, his green streaked hair makes him a most distinguished character. Blanc has designed several hundred vertical gardens around the world in the last twenty years.
On Monday our social worker will be coming to do a H&S check of the house so we have been child proofing the house... I cannot begin to tell you the amount of times I have tried to open a cupboard and almost broke my arm lol...
Thanks Sofia.
This one is for all the Northern Hemisphere people.
In fact, Astro is prepared to go further. It not only censored the BBC report, but it did so without informing its Malaysian audience. Malaysian viewers were misled into thinking that the doctored report was the genuine voice of the BBC!
I have included a before picture during the organizing process with all of our papers sorted for each binder, an inside shot of how I've utilized the sleeves within the binder, and a few outside shots of the new setup in my office. I also bought an adorable wall file holder from the container store to store urgent papers, with matching aqua striped file folders from Walmart. I would urge anyone who has trouble finding or sorting important papers to utilize this method, it's honestly a life saver!
During our recent trip to California, as we drove for hours through the ever-changing scenery, we saw miles upon mile of Wind Turbines. Those Wind-Movers caught energy! Turbines, evidently, come in varying sizes ranging between small to very large; even at a distance. We saw semi-trailers driving down the highway, along, carrying one of those large wind turbines. It was amazing to see how huge the machine looks; up close and personal.
--the need for more parks and green space
When I finally comfortably (remember, I wasn’t actually stuffed to the brim – I could have eaten more) and regally rose from my throne, this is what was in my tummy along with my unborn baby girl. Brace yourselves…
Mr Baey’s response this time appeared to contrast his immediate reaction to NUS PRC scholar Sun Xu’s infamous remark on there ‘being more dogs than humans in Singapore.’
Well, not quite... the plot is severely lacking, the editing, script and soundtrack are all a little questionable, some moments are as jokey as hell and the sentimental sub plot has no real pay off but due to the aforementioned plus points, there shall be no complaints here.
Another good thing if you live here (even in the drear Midlands or perish the thought in the even drearer North) is that you are never far away from the sea! At most, a couple of hundred miles of travel is all that is required to spend a day at the sea.
One of my favourite fruits in creamy yumminess! You got to try this. Do not have any fresh lychees available? No problem, this delicious Lychee Ice Cream is made from the canned lychees, how about that for convenience? Another bonus is, there's no egg yolks used in this recipe. Even better!
This is the last week that I really need television to happen. After Friday I’ll just be watching The Avengers over and over, so TV can go ahead and take a break after that. Here’s what we’ve got in the meantime.
In the past year, Dom Fernow (of Prurient and Hospital Records) has unleashed a torrent of cassettes recorded under the alias Vatican Shadow. On these limited-edition tapes, Fernow eschews both the feedback-and-vocal noise of the bulk of his output and the weird, minimal synth confessionals of this year's Prurient full-length, Bermuda Drain. Instead, Vatican Shadow is all about 80s tape noise culture, primitive power electronics and crude synth experiments. It's also some of the best music Fernow has made. The artwork and song titles of these releases make references to contemporary news stories from the War on Terror, a nod to the polemical politics of noise pioneers like Muslimgauze and the shock-value obsession with death and violence that run all through this scene. But the music itself betrays little hint of these obsessions, except in the way it sonically creates a mood of downbeat introspection. Fernow blends martial industrial beats with minimal, hauntingly beautiful synthesizer lines that wouldn't be out of place on a noise tape, a Tangerine Dream album, or a modern drone disc. The result is surprisingly powerful considering the simple elements. The tension between the pulsing, machine-like rhythms and the fragile beauty of the synths, which are sometimes crushed beneath the beats, and sometimes soar above them, provides an aural equivalent of the thematic emphasis on war and contemporary politics. This particular set, a box of four short tapes, is perhaps the best (and the most beat-heavy) of many Vatican Shadow releases from this year, but they're almost uniformly excellent, and thankfully they've all been released digitally to compensate for the scarcity of the physical releases. [buy]
They are micro-fiber, and nothing against all you micro-fiber folks
Children do love stories about children who are even naughtier than themselves. Go to a primary school on their Dressing-Up As A Children's Book Character Day, and you always bump in to multiple Pippi Longstockings and Horrid Henrys. Well, there's a new kid on the block as far as fictional naughty children go, and her name is Martha Bones. As a middle child myself, I relate to Martha, loathing her goody-goody older sister, jealous of her can-do-nothing-wrong baby brother, vying with friend/enemy next door, but expressing all those familiar feelings in such joyously REALLY NAUGHTY ways (she bit Father Christmas, for goodness sake!) that she's a real pleasure to read about. It's Martha's view of events that we get, and we very quickly realise that her views are somewhat prejudiced. A few sentences into the story we are told - 'It wasn't fair, she thought. anybody could accidentally drop their sister's library book down the toilet. And then pull the flush. anybody could accidentally write Baby For Sale accross their baby brother's head. In green felt-tip. The Non-Wash-Offable kind.' Isn't that escalating of naughtiness to the point of wickedness delicious?! But a reluctant and incompetent Interstellar Agent (an updated form of Guardian Angel) called Fred is soon doing battle to make Martha good. The results of their tussle are fast-moving and slapstick, with situations all too familar from real family life, but taken here to enjoyable extreme. But this isn't just a comic romp of a book; it also lightly explores something of the complexities of goodness and badness to show that things aren't always black and white, and that adults as well as children struggle with goodness.
Spring does the same thing to me. Winter is just chunky and seems like it stays the same forever and then all of a sudden there are flowers everywhere, grass is green and not brown for a brief period of semi-arid climate joyfullness (unless you have allergies) and people are out on my path.
15 OBSESSION (Giorgio Moroder) 4'52
This blog is not just about CDD. It's about whatever pops into this messed up little head of mine, because we are not just about CDD. I tend to vent about things that get on my nerves, scare me, interest me, etc...know that. Like I tell folks who know me...tread lightly here. So, what do you do when you don't like the program...change the channel! Hopefully that won't be necessary though.
We urge smokers not to take risks with their health. Don't substitute electronic cigarettes - with their many question marks - for the well-known and well-characterized risks you get with your normal cigarettes. Do you really want to be inhaling a vapor that could potentially contain some harmful chemicals, when instead, you could be inhaling smoke whose harmful constituents have already been neatly categorized and classified?
The borough has been approved for two grants: one for $250,000 for public improvements and one for $50,000 to help implement various revitalization programs.
Find the gradient, then follow it.
I don’t know what time travel feels like but I’m assuming it feels something like this. I remember starting the script, then looking up and seeing that I was on page 30! *And I hadn’t written a single note down.* Just for reference, I usually have a couple pages of notes by the end of the first act.
expected, because when those
On the Banks of Plum Creek by Laura Ingalls Wilder
2. In the supernatural world of Chicagoland Vampires, politics seem to play an important role in the way the Houses are run. Now that you’ve been introduced to the Rogues, do you think it’s better for vampires to be a part of a House or to live outside of one.
Later I'm thinking that I may just go to Lowe's and Home Depot for a couple items they carry and take a look at new washing machines and maybe new stove. My washer was second hand reconditioned when we got it and it worked good for a long time,BUT I betcha I can get a new simple model that will do a better job and use less water.
And the number one thing I hate about parenting at this very moment:
To end this week, I want to share with you a song I really love! I love how anthem-like, passionate, and powerful the words are, as well as the melody! Enjoy! :D
Now, I'm a person that can normally sleep just about anywhere, but for some reason I CANNOT get any shut-eye on a plane. But I've got to try because I'm facing a long day of traveling after I land. With the seat tray down, I try resting my elbows on it while placing my head lightly on the seat in front of me. At this point I begin to feel a pulse of some kind, and I think, "I can feel my pulse in my hands!" But when I look up I notice that the (shaved) head in front of me is bouncing back and forth to some kind of silent beat. He has a set of head phones on is having his own little dance party through the night - all the way from Las Vegas to OKC. No sleeping that way.
But just because I've been quiet about posting, doesn't mean I haven't been busy working!
Best when shared! :)
"Do we have the determination to confront the slow-motion moral collapse(1) that has taken place in parts of our country(2) these past few generations(3)?
I didn't leave the USA this year.
It's not so much of an innocent act, apparently, if you Bing.
Some problems caused by celiac disease may not improve, such as a shorter than expected height and damage to the teeth.
If you need to know anything about Bloomington, Ryan probably has the answer considering he’s lived here his whole life. (He was even born in Bloomington Hospital!) He now resides in the Bloomington area with his wife (Becky), 3 kids, and a cat. You might be surprised to find out that the head of the household is actually the cat, according to Ryan.
* “This is the worst multi-racial composition of the government service, with the lowest Chinese and Indian representation in the public service in Malaysia’s 53-year history. This is clearly seen from the three sets of comparative figures of the racial breakdown of the civil service before the NEP (1971) and as compared to Dec. 2009 – Malays (60.80 per cent and 78.2 per cent); Chinese (20.2% and 5.8 per cent); Indians (17.4 per cent and 4.0 per cent); and Others (1.6 per cent and 4.2 per cent).
Whew…oh yes, where was I?
Arizona, will you marry me? (Oh sorry, Michigan. I still love you too!)
Interesting Fact: Tin foil was used to fill cavities in teeth before the 20th century. If you have fillings today and have ever chewed a piece of aluminium foil, this fact should make you squirm!
“Until an Arizona appellate court reverses the result in this case it means that people who enter into contracts that relate in any way to Arizona medical marijuana will have to hope the other side to the contract satisfies his/her/its obligations because it may not be possible to sue for breach of contract and get a judgment against the party who defaults,” Keyt wrote.
They loved each other so much. They lived the picture of a loving marriage. They had their struggles and were not perfect, but they loved each other so deeply. It used to bring me so much joy to go places with them and watch them youthfully holding hands with each other.
P.S:
(benjamin actually sat still for 2 hours!)
But understanding isn’t agreement. Get your act together, Internets, and stop depending on your spellchecker to correct your errors. That’s serious laziness.
Carved by wind, water and grit
FYI it does not look like your ppv carrier is not showing this (which would have been dumb) so its all Youtube exclusive.
Still, it's a fun read. And if you like Riordan, you'll probably like this series, too.
As a final, parting comment, it was this kind of uneasy portrayal of right and wrong that I was expecting from (and didn’t experience) playing Shadow of the Colossus. Bastion delivers that missing narrative impact in spades, and if those few details have piqued your interest then I would highly recommend playing Bastion for yourself, if only to see how story narration can be done simply and effectively without the need for long-winded cut-scenes. I guarantee that you won’t find another game like it anywhere else. Recording what happens is one thing, but the experience of playing Bastion is something else entirely – to borrow the words of Rucks,
“My Lord!” Kinney groaned, half in earnest. “Old times starting all over again! My Lord!”
CENTCOM says there are about 125,000 US troops in close proximity to Iran. The majority of them – 90,000 – are deployed in or around Afghanistan. Some 20,000 soldiers are ashore elsewhere in the Near East region; and a variable 15,000 to 20,000 serve on naval vessels.
It just didn't guarantee a pretty little future..........
Then she was worried about doggy's fate. She wanted to know if there were crabs down there. That's a reference to Finding Nemo - Nemo gets flushed down a toilet/sink and comes out of a pipe where crabs are crawling around. I told her no crabs, just water. "Is doggy wet? Is it dark? Is he scared?" I had to stifle a laugh when she asked with dead-pan seriousness "maybe the peepee and poopoo can bring my doggy back?"
Clark: "Oh, here's my secret ingredient"
With a petite figure and a short height
It was recorded at Studio 12B in Reykjavik – who owns and runs the studio and how come you recorded there?
ISBN-13: 978-1-4391-9832-2
See, that was easy as could be and only took minutes, and there you have it, your very own Prima
An FJP official said the party’s vote-counting observers expect the group to win as much as 50% of the vote. A Nour Party spokesman said the early returns point to a Salafi capture of about 10% to 15% of seats in the incoming Parliament.
This is what it looked like when it got to our table.
He makes no splash because the water erupts as he is still dropping and the wide open toothy maw of a crocodile plucks the Halfling out of the air. A this point, one of the excellent mothers who plays Sola when not enough people shows up pipes in. She remembers that Halflings have a little thing called Halflings luck, which gives them a second chance. Glaring at the mother (but secretly impressed and happy that she remembered something about a character that wasn’t even her own) I describe how at the last moment the Halfling twists in an effort to escape the gaping jaws. He didn’t.
But what of the man and what of his writing? Admittedly I have not read as much of his work as I would have liked but so far, I have enjoyed what I have read. My first exposure was the short story Tis the Season, a near-future dystopian tale where Christmas has been privatised and license agreements are required and limits placed on the trinkets and traditions you might want to indulge in. Not so much a pop at commercialism as it is about intellectual rights and the absurdity of the politicisation of copyright law. Firmly tongue in cheek, it is an amusing parable for the times.
"The ANC is extremely disappointed and puzzled with the ruling of the South Gauteng High court to refuse our request for leave to appeal an earlier finding by the same court relating to the singing of a freedom song.
- £10 per person for a one course dinner
How was your bank holiday weekend!? I do hope all my UK friends were able to enjoy themselves despite the rain? It wasn't so bad here in the end and while my Man was at work I spent a quiet day at home happily on my own. After fixing my printer, giving old Bertha a base coat of white paint (yep, finally succumb to the white!), doing a few chores here and there I had time left to crochet a bunch of garland flowers while watching WALL-E. Nothing exciting, just a day to myself and it felt good... :)
King: Very well. Take her away.
Those that are not enjoying the entertainment will be labeled as eccentric or worse still, ill. Please do not pull aside the curtain. It is distracting.
physical quality and relevance to the recipient’s request, materials and staff for packing, a means of shipping to Africa, and all necessary paperwork for customs and shipping. The ASA cannot offer any services in arranging shipping or other logistics. Our role is to supply funding to the greatest
I cut them up in chunks, dusted them with olive oil, salt, and some balsamic vinegar and roasted them at 450 for 25 minutes.
Seems as though the course could use another terrific novel, but not sure there’ll be time. (I will be teaching the same students the second semester in British Lit, so will read my fav novel, Pride and Prejudice, then….) Any suggestions or feedback on my very preliminary text list?
Truly love them.
There, you're just plain wrong.......
A visit to City Market with a good friend last weekend was just what I needed: a mini escape from the 'burbs and the chance to see and taste some different delights. I love the diversity of people, the sounds and smells, the array of fruits, veggies, spices, and fresh-baked goods. Sometimes a 30 minute drive is all you need to feel as if you're in a different city.
So then she asked me a lot of questions about how I feel, asking me to rate symptoms I have on scales of 1-10.
This booklet is written to point out the reality from which some people turn away because their interests are at odds with it, and also to disclose the frauds and senseless deductions on which some systems of thought are based. This is why many diverse subjects are tackled in the booklet.
I like their tribute episodes but I’m sorry, the Michael Jackson episode was JUST okay. I thought I’d end up feeling the same way about Whitney Houston but I was surprised to see myself get *ahem* so emotional, baby. Yeah, I just went there.
It's also the one thing that is keeping me thinking about the positive things in life, and JUST at those moments when I really, really need it.
Like driven snow against the trees,
on Sunday, May 6th (be sure to set your alarm, mark your calendar or whatever else you need to do to get yourself some valuable freebies). If you don't have a TpT account, set one up so you can hit the jackpot!
A very pale and low-alcohol summer beer style that also hails from Germany, Berliner Weisse looks and tastes a little like lemonade. In fact, it's popular to mix with syrups.
1 Intro
6) Color of the Moment: Coral & Turquoise - I have enjoyed writing about and creating design boards for my weekly color series, and this is one of my favorite color combos.
I highly recommend this place. So much so that President Nathan himself gave his endorsement!
Armed with my unshakeable faith, I felt only scorn for black magicians who summoned up a demon and then fell prey to it. It seemed obvious to me that one should always fight for God and against the Devil. God, after all, was invincible and always right. If you fought for God, God would look after you, even if the Devil or one of his minions ripped off your head. Work for God and you go to Heaven. Work for the Devil and you go to Hell. The equation was simple.
You should always mention a few lines regarding your previous companies and employers. All the employers are fascinated to know regarding your job history. You also need to talk about a few tasks that you had to perform in your previous company. You could say that you were responsible for several projects and ventures in your previous company.
Barack O’TomA spiked the Bin Laden is dead football during exclusive Jessica Simpson baby news coverage from the safety of Afghanistan. Declaring that the anniversary of the killing of Bin Laden will be a national holiday, O’TomA commissioned a new Quarter with his head on one side and Bin Laden’s head on the other side. Most true Americans appreciate O’TomA bravery as he watched the killing from the Situation Room via Skype.
and by broken i mean ‘special needs’. and by special needs I mean a plethora of things:
But wait! There’s more! Before I duck my head in anticipation of the comments about to come my way…just for the record:
Even leaving aside the question of inclusion ( it goes without saying that women, not to mention foreigners, did not perform the ritual dances), there have been numerous alterations.
I had hoped that the trail would offer me glimpes of the fields and marsh adjacent to the north side of Mer Bleue. But the fog limited my view to no more than a hundred meters. Occasionally, I heard birds in the mist, and one flooded corn field held a few dozen geese and a pair of wood ducks. In the dim light, I couldn't make out the colours of the wood ducks, but knew them from their silhouettes. Just before reaching Milton Road, I found a red-tail hawk sitting in a tall, old elm beside the trail. But before I could dig my camera out of my pack, he flew off into the mist, with a parting "keeerrr!" of complaint at my intrusion.
Since 1803, the Supreme court has used its power of judicial review to repeal nearly a thousand state statutes, including (progs take note) Roe v. Wade. Another 160 acts of Congress, including 6 New Deal laws that overstepped the limits of the Commerce Clause, plus over 50 in the just the past three decades, have been struck down. That’s about five a year — hardly “unprecedented.”
The farmhouse sink is framed by elegant cabriole legs from Ellsley’s Villa Collection for Enkeboll.
HP: What did you do before becoming an author?
So if you don’t wear much powder or want to start getting into it, this is a great one to try as it’s a real bargain but it works! Plus it lasts ages!
The bathroom door slammed shut.
“Of course it hasn’t.” I replied, “and, just in case that once-in-a-lifetime happens again between here and the car…”
Total Size: 1,19 GB
Well, it’s all coming to an end of late as the term winds down and the students disappear quicker than free petrol. I have completed my courses and given back marks and comments and now await the onslaught of the exam period after the break.
I pause, gasping for breath. It never got easier, only more familiar, like an old enemy who’s weakness you know as well as his strength.
1 large cucumber, peeled and finely grated* (all hard seeds removed)
But then I began to consider the presence of the medical volunteers. I had already pondered what their coming meant to me in a general sense, but was there any significance to their having visited during Holy Week?
I wasn't completely lost since the author does a good job of explaining just enough of the background so that you can follow along with what's going on. Obviously there was an operation gone wrong, and now a threat hangs over Meara's head. She's got plans to find herself a mate. With her brother gone in his honeymoon she has the run of their resort to rent out only to available and eligible shifters. She's gone through the paces and has them all lined up.
444130 Hardware stores
I found out about the book because the author, Marianne Martin, was interviewed by the film maker, Brian Alexander for the Pittmann Puckett Documentary- yes, there is a film being made about you and your partner's murder, and how it mobilized the gay-lesbian community into action. Did you know that the Michigan organization you founded (with others), Affirmations, is still going strong? It serves as a community and support center for people who are discovering and/or celebrating their sexual identity. There is an art gallery named after you, too, and I copied the dedication for you:
Hi Mrs. Pear!
Indeed, Pete. This rules.
“We received an impressive array of submissions from people of all ages,” explains Tetu’s Luc Biecq. “After much consideration, the jury selected this campaign. With a condom, there is pleasure, joy, the happiness of being able to love, freely, without exclusion.”
Sorry, I don't do long posts like Paul in his blog posts or rambles as he puts it, there's only so much you can write about flowers after all, but I was surprised when I did the mouse-over of this one how dark the original photo was compared to the finished one.
Problem is, I discovered later, it is riddled with errors. Wrong years, wrong artists connected to the wrong songs, duplication, etc. Well! What I did originally was whittle down the two hundred or so into a disc's worth--and keeping the most interesting versions while doing so. Then I forgot about it, until recently.
B-R-O-W-N
Week 5? Am I really in Week 5? I'm not sure if it's because I didn't post a training recap last week or what but how is it already Week 5?
Conditions can make you run
Scot Meacham Wood – I would be completely remiss not to mention the 13 years I spent working with Ralph Lauren as a huge influence on my style. I can still remember seeing those first Home Collection ads in the mid 80’s and practically swooning. It was one of the main reasons that I decided to work for Ralph Lauren. As far as other designers, well, I’d have to start with Michael Smith, Vicente Wolf, Phoebe Howard, Miles Redd, Ken Fulk, Roger Banks-Pye, and Suzanne Kasler. And though I love each of them for differing reasons, the one aspect of their design that I most respect is their great attention to detail.
However this one is much different, but I don't mind as long as it looks as elegant as it does. And it's really practical cause it doesn't create any weird bulges, because it somehow hug your waist or so XD
A VOLUNTEER is a person who remembers to do the thing to make other people happy, who takes the loneliness out of the alone by talking to them, who is concerned when others are unconcerned, who has the courage to be a prophet and to say the things that have to be said for the good of all.
I tried so hard to rearrange your mind
In the small town of Duivel, Missouri, darkness awaits....
With the good of independence comes the bad of detachment from my best friend, the person I like to regurgitate my day to and who generally makes me feel awesome and loved and all that. I do miss that and it has made me a little sad, disconnected, etc.
Post before last I included a picture of myself and one of my weekly critique partners. Someone on Facebook then commented that I was either really tall or she is really short. I responded that I was 6'5" and than spawned a discussion about height. They complained that at only a hair over 5 foot life is harder for them. I wasn't quick witted enough to fire right back but after a bit of deliberations I have now created a list of hardships that plague we taller than average folks.
So that means the galaxy is an entangled state with itself. This now explains why all the constellations and solar systems are not following Newtonian movement. Instead, they all move together as one around the center, because they are entangled. I’ve just given the reason for it, and science will start to understand that soon. It has been a mystery so far, but now you know.
We had the Grilled Pork Bún Khô, this is pork with vermicelli rice noodle and salad served with nuoc cham dressing (fish sauce with lime, water and sugar). This plate was quite huge, however a large proportion of the plate was given over to the very pointless bean sprout which annoyingly is always used to fill out Vietnamese dishes. The pork rather than that smokey lemongrass bbq flavour we expected was slightly curried flavour with a tinge of yellow, it was ok but not punchy enough and way too sad for Vietnamese.
so i decided to make a little case for her ipad, to protect it when its in her purse.
Next up, Devil's Canyon Brewing from my home town of Belmont May 31st. By then, Chef Yamanaka will have time to breathe, get his sea legs, and whatever other cliches you want to add by then. It ought to be interesting.
I willingly admit that I crave alone time. I enjoy time in my sewing room - it's really my sanctuary - I feel very at peace in there! In my personal Disneyland. LOL I can't remember the last time I spent time alone in my sewing room - just me and my thoughts. Sigh!
When you are in a bad place, when things are not going the way you want them to, don’t forget that you touch other people around you. You may not know the value you give others, so don’t discount it. Just as it is unlikely that you can walk down a path without touching a bug or a blade of grass, it is unlikely that you can walk through your life without touching others on your way. Remember the value you give just by interacting with others, and let that knowledge kindle your own flame just as it kindles theirs.
FRI
Some scholars claim that dried cakes and stewed prunes were considered prophylactic against the pox and used as prescriptions for syphilitics. But whatever the reason, most scholars who interest themselves in Ladies of the Night agree that a bowl of prunes was the trading sign of a brothel. In Wit’s Miserie, or the World’s Madnesse (1596), Thomas Lodge says of a bawd, "you shall know her dwelling by a dish of stewd pruins in the window, and two or three fleering wenches sit knitting or sewing in her shop.” And Shakespeare goes to town on prunes and brothels. In The Merry Wives of Windsor, Master Slender pleads lack of appetite for food and women, claiming sexual mishap has put him out of action: “I bruised my shin th' other day with playing at sword and dagger with a master of fence; three veneys for a dish of stewed prunes; and, by my troth, I cannot abide the smell of hot meat since.” And in Measure for Measure, a play which gleefully compromises attempts at astringent morality, Shakespeare gets right to it and relishes the visual pun between the creased, globular fruit and a pair of bollocks nestled in a certain kind of “dish” – Elbow’s wife is led into a brothel by her craving for prunes. Pompey explains to the law that she was “great with child, and longing,—saving your honour’s reverence,—for stewed prunes. Sir, we had but two in the house, which at that very distant time stood, as it were, in a fruit-dish, a dish of some three-pence; your honours have seen such dishes; they are not China dishes, but very good dishes.”
The picture above references episode 22 which is about Konata’s mom who passed while Konata was a baby. This episode pulls at the heartstrings and helped answer why Konata is like the way she is. It kind of sticks out from the other episodes since it feels like it belongs in a show like Kanon but it’s a welcome change of pace. And speaking of Konata, she was voiced by Aya Hirano who once again shows why she’s one of the top seiyuu; just try to figure that she’s the same person who voiced Haruhi last year.
I know you just happened to be so-oh bored
Its a nice sunny morning so just perfect for s little jaunt to visit Crafty Urchins, wink,wink :D
But it's still incomprehensible to me that she was and is such a success, even though I think I probably read every word she wrote when I was a child. Not one character, incident, idea or line of dialogue remains to me from that deluge of prose; she went through me like a dose of salts. The idea of reissuing her books now, or cleaning them up to be PC or having someone write sequels is anathema: there are so many better writers working in the field of children's books now - let's just bury Enid.
Lord Jesus, I am a sinner in need of a Savior. I believe that you were born of a virgin, crucified for my sins, and on the third day rose from the dead. Please forgive me of my sins, come into my heart and save me. Fill me with your Holy Spirit. Amen.
Adam Scott makes a nice leap from the small screen (he’s so good in the series Party Down, as well as Parks & Recreation) and the rest of the supporting cast (Maya Rudolph, Jon Hamm, Chris O’Dowd, Kristen Wiig) inhabit their roles with that effortless ease you’d expect from actors accustomed to being in front of the camera.
By the way, when we moved and found a new church, Matt began the process of starting an FPU class before we actually joined. We are now in the 3rd semester of teaching it and we are so blessed to see it change other people's lives like it did ours!
Weird Deaths
I hope this post doesn't come off as a complaint. I love my girls and love holding them. But as I said, this is HARD, Hard work. I don't want to forget what each day is like, mostly because I know that in just a few weeks everything will be different again. What an adventure we are on. I'm grateful for those around me who can help.
However, today, I was invited to an event where kudos were given to those who have done something that is recognised as being for the good for the company. I was given a wee certificate under the category 'We Couldn't Have Done it Without You' and, embarrassed as I was at having to step on to a stage and accept my 'award', I was grateful that someone had taken the trouble to nominate me in the first place.
The city administrator of Spasticville, Kansas, said he has applied to the U.S. Geological Survey to have the city's name changed to Trails End.
2) I can't find the pictures of the completed and plated cake. Hmmmm... Do not lose hope though! I'm still looking!
What a blast! I had to keep myself from staying out longer. I felt like running for 50 kilometers, at least. I'll hit the weights and stationary bike this afternoon, then plan on running both Saturday and Sunday. I'll keep my mileage to about 10 miles for each day. Next weekend, I'll ante-up and do back to back long runs, if I'm up to it.
Last month, on a dark and rainy afternoon, my son and I met up with my agent, Philippa Milnes-Smith, at the Old Vic Tunnels to see a performance of Uncle Montague's Stories from the Shadows, a theatrical interpretation of four stories from Uncle Montague's Tales of Terror.
In goes the sauces- tomato, soy and oyster. Mix well, add salt and pepper as required after doing a taste test and then the water.
Who would have thought these wee beasties could cause so much trauma?
Emerson and Cheryl were extraordinary hosts. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. As for Marti, simply put, this retreat would not have happened without her. She is now considering the possibility of opening up her own Italian Taxi Service! And as for me, I came to Italy to help others, but the others I tried to help, wound up helping me. How can I be anything but grateful?
Today, I had the privilege of donating my time to help a very worthy cause, the Wendy’s Dreamlift Day (http://www.sunshine.ca/events/wendys-dreamlift-day-2012). This is the 18th year of the event, and the one in which the cumulative total money raised will exceed $1Million!
It seems my crystal came back from Mexico impregnated with a ton of information on our DNA. But this last set of information, hard for me to digest and I pray I have understood it enough to share it coherently!
Why is that chinaman throwing a watermelon into a peach basket? Taiwan? Racist? There are races? Do you mean like three legged races?
"Since Publishers Weekly ran a story about Brittany Geragotelis, an unrepresented aspiring writer with a self-published YA novel and a huge online following, her life has taken a dramatic turn. Geragotelis’s novel, Life’s a Witch, self-published this fall via Amazon/CreateSpace, has been acquired at auction by Simon & Schuster Books for Young Readers in a three-book, six-figure deal that features an e-book prequel series to be released in 2012. Life’s a Witch will be published in fall 2013 and a sequel will be released in 2014.
*The new manual is still at the editors, so please be patient! We are printing only as many as we need for each class right now, so if you can't wait any longer, just retake a local class and you can get the manual now, rather than waiting for the final, wire-bound manual that we will eventually have back.
"That's the whole idea," Jessica said, waving a forkful of bean sprouts for emphasis. "I'm tired of hum drum existence. Boring job, boring life."
While the winter solstice ushers us into the fourth season, defined by cold and darkness, it also brings with it that slight glimpse of hope. The Romans called this day Dies Natalis Solis Invicti, meaning the Birthday of the Unconquered Sun.
It's also a good idea to designate a shoe box for warranties, instruction booklets, and important receipts. It only takes five minutes to find a shoe box today, but you'll save yourself all kinds of time and frustration in the future.
What do we have in Iraq?
The looming August 2nd deadline for raising the debt-ceiling, and the stalemate in Congress make this plan a possible option for the Obama administration. It is a maneuver where the President can bypass the will of Congress and skip over the debt limit by having the Treasury mint a trillion dollar platinum coin. The idea, in one sense, is reminiscent of other Presidential end-runs like a recess appointment or a pocket veto. In this case you could call it finding monumental pocket change in the seat cushions at the Treasury.
I'm not much of a car person. Other than putting gas in it (when I can afford to!!), I'm pretty much clueless. I just want a car that runs, gets me where I want to go and back again, is relatively safe and big enough to accommodate my shopping trips! That said, over the years I have, however, had several pretty nifty little cars....a Corvair convertible, a Mustang, and a little red Fiero that I just loved!
6 oz. Frank's hot sauce (Frank's isn't quite as spicy but I think it has one of the best flavors. If you prefer more heat add some crushed red pepper or cayenne or just use a more intense hot sauce).
And toucan fly so much better than ewe
Kola nut should not be used with muscle relaxants, heart medications, high blood pressure medication, nitrates and calcium-channel blockers.
Of course, that must not have been enough.
This is one sticky point that many people bring up - what if these designs or this entire project was somehow used to create gross stuff that I don't support, like child pornography or hate propaganda for example.
I love the colours in this piece. Although I am not "a collector" I feel somewhat tempted to add to this vase and create a grouping with other Studio-Linie pieces. The generous white field creates an airiness that allows for combining additional vessels...
Areas would abandoned allegation 5 houses and a few dozen association to be accurately classified as a city, and a lot of cities would be aural a reasonable walking ambit from anniversary other.
I'm just now getting a chance to upload my card for last week's splitcoast sketch challenge. My photo below is of the sketch we were to follow. This was such a cute sketch and I wanted to make sure to play along. I could image all sorts of smaller stamps being used for this sketch.
I haven’t floated like this in ages….
A third and very important characteristic of hokku aesthetics is a sense of transience. Behind all of our practice of hokku there should be — sometimes fainter, sometimes stronger — the sense of evanescence, the sense that everything in this world is temporary, whether it be a blooming flower or a leaf on a tree or our lives. There is nothing which we can hold on to always, because everything in life, everything in the universe, comes only to go. It arises and then passes away.
Nozbe is obviously custom-made to be a GTD tool, and it’s well worth the $9.95 a month it costs me to subscribe. I’ve found it to be much more helpful and functional for GTD than Evernote ever was! Some of the main things I like about it…
Asafetodia: ¼ teaspoon
will give us clothes.
Don’t get me wrong – I’m not judging. I’m in a glass house here. When considering writing this post, I started recounting all the crazy stuff to which I’ve admitted on this blog. Over the past 10 months, I’ve revealed a lot. Perhaps, I’m being a little too honest on here. Maybe I should keep some of this crazy to myself. Like the time I drove by my ex fiancé’s house, or the time I stole a shirt from him right before I moved out and I currently keep it in my closet, or all about my baggage/trust issues where I want to check up on my partner by checking his phone for suspicious messages. There’s plenty more I have yet to reveal, like how when my ex and I broke up, I found out about some lies he told me and then I proceeded to go through every bank account, every email, every phone record, every little slip of paper I could find in our home, to try to find out the entire truth. I wanted to know everything there was to know. So yeah, I’ve done some crazy stuff.
You can use smaller jars, for the pickles, (probably about 4) Recalling one recipe, on the Internet, I really cringed at the thought of up to 10 lbs of Kirby cucumbers, putting them in the bathtub...yuk! Doesn't matter how clean is your bath tub, to me, just is not something I would do. In a clean kitchen sink, with less...let's say about half the amount, maybe up to 5lbs, is more like it! ...but then, you need a lot of empty sterilized jars, and a "cold basement"...which we do not have here, in South Florida, so small amount is the best, and to refrigerate it!
~Right 2 *Hide what your gov’t really Does!???
The voters that do have an attention span, and mostly moderates at this stage of the election process, have the intelligence to know that Obama isn”t anti-American.
It's been an exciting weekend for fans of Eric Ravilious and Tirzah Ravilious (nee Garwood), with a double-page spread on the former in the Review section of Saturday's Guardian followed by a display of the latter's work on the Antiques Roadshow (17-18 mins in). I hope people will be encouraged by all this publicity to visit the Fry Art Gallery in Saffron Walden, where you can see work by both artists.
In the meantime, I'm finishing a Shutterfly photo book that I've worked on non-stop for a week. I received a gift certificate from TripAdvisor after writing a review for them but it expires tomorrow. No way do I want to lose it. I'm titling it "Holland: Through My Lens" (101 pages, the limit) unless one of you comes up with something a bit more exciting. Remember helping us name our Granny Towanda car?!
His presence sheds eternal day
Level 9: MP Cost: 20, Duration: 270 seconds, All Stats: +5%.
The only way I was able to salvage them was to put them into little mini cupcake baking cups and pretend that they were supposed to be "artistically messy" cakes. I ended up just drizzling the ganache and caramel over them, as if it was always supposed to be that way, then topped it off with a tiny pinch of sea salt. Humph! I had admitted defeat! Plus, by that time, my baking self-esteem was so low that I couldn't bare to attempt another batch.
I hate writing kissing scenes.
Chuck, the father sitting next to me, controlled the 30 second clock and the two of us usually talked as much about the varsity team as the JV team playing before us. His son was an outstanding defensive lineman who led the team in every statistic; most tackles, most sacks, most recovered fumbles, etc. Chuck’s son was proud of his accomplishments, and everyone knew it. The father was proud of the son, and everyone knew it. Both of them were constantly being lavished with praise and high fives, all of it well deserved.
I’ve been trying to catch up on reading blogs. I haven’t got through them all. I think I managed to hit a couple like buttons between my Percocet dreamz, but I couldn’t really say for sure.
The way Medieval Times works is basically a rehearsed play. Every night, a new knight gets to be the "winner" of the tournament. There is also a different knight every time playing the role of the bad guy. It just so happens that while we were there, our assigned hate was to be placed on the bad guy of the night.
When you arrive at the Boston Bar Association Housing Court Lawyer for the Day (“Housing Court”) on Thursday, one thing you can be sure of is that Attorney Chris Saccardi will be there. Since 2009, Chris has donated his time every Thursday to assist unrepresented landlords and tenants on Eviction Day. As he gained more experience and knowledge, he began to take pro bono cases for full representation and eventually focused his private practice in the area of landlord/tenant law. Chris’ consistent presence has led to him being the go-to private attorney for recruiting and supervising other attorneys in the project.
sean guessed the guy's name was brian and i guessed brad.
As we continue to walk we could begin to see the hexagonal shape of the stones that make up the Causeway. The rocks are basalt so there must have been a volcano active in the area at one time. We spent the better part of the next two hours climbing on the rocks and taking pictures, some of which are below. The beauty of the setting was awe-inspiring even in the rain.
My WHY is not my kids. It is not security. It is not fame. It is not fortune. My WHY is my dad.
This week’s Folk Friday is a tribute to my chapter mates - those ‘wild women’ full of creativity. Enjoy!
6. A good friend or two to share the essentials with (you don’t have to share your wine; I’ll keep your secret).
we sat in the office
2. I had a quilt shop once, never to do that again, but LOVED IT A LOT! My sweet husband says he will open it again in a second. All I have to do is say YES. I keep telling him all I want is my own store, where I can go and get fabric, start some thing new. This is just what he has given me. My very own STORE.
"Separate Lives (White Nights)
Or all drift off one at a time?
“Oh, fighting people of our great nation – what are you waiting for, their vile summit?”
This police officer – currently Craig MACKAY (former Chief Constable of Cumbria) – is the 2nd highest ranking officer in the UK and is usually a former Chief Constable. He was appointed by HM the Queen on the Home Secretary’s recommendation.
I remember a few years back I was fly fishing Modesto Reservoir for spotted bass in a float tube. It was January but a clear day and man, the temps came up to about 60 degrees so I stripped off my shirt and started catching nice sized spots by casting small poppers right off the point of this small island. After about 45 minutes I put my shirt back on but the damage was done. I had sunburned my fucking armpits. Between holding my arms up to cast my fly and the sun reflecting off that clear water, my shit was cooked. I walked around for a week holding my arms out like some exaggerated gunfighter pose.
It has to be something that reminds her of her first band camp.
(For each of these spiritual blessings -- and you could certainly add more, like salvation, sanctification, etc. -- write out 3 verses that describe that particular blessing. Then write a brief statement or prayer describing why you thank and praise God for that blessing.)
Looks like my doubt meter was indicating correctly at the smell of the situation being not self defense at all. The broader approach by not using a grand jury seems to be all good.
The whole herb, in common with other species of lysimachia, is said to have astringent and demulcent properties. Herbalists say that it is unusual to find both these properties in any one herb.
Taxi! Gimcheon Science Festival, please. I point to a street-lamp with a flag indicating the dates and times of the Festival. A student has a booth, I told her I would go. Too bad I don't know where it is or how to get there.
1. Welcome Christmas from How The Grinch Stole Christmas
Family Time together.
First, we lined up at the Castle to watch the Castle Lighting Ceremony….
“Sorry. I was cleaning up in here.” She pushed off her knees and stood, adjusting her shirt over some very full breasts and grinned at him. “I’m so glad you’re here. Let’s go to my office where it’s a little less insane.”
* 10 beautiful window style ,removable sidewalls
Bend the eyebrows back into position and you're done! Toss on a brown hat, tan pans, brown shoes, and voila! That's one good lookin' Goomba.
The Digital Publishing Platform can be extended or integrated into individual customer’s current system landscape enabling maximal leveraging of the invested IT assets.
A further intriguing notion that was suggested on this blog’s comments a while back was that unless a religious experience is entirely novel and unique to a particular individual, all religious experience is syncretistic. Think about this for a moment. Many of us in modern polytheism may have a sense of our polytheism, or may actively be pursuing it in practice. Then, suddenly, we’ll have an experience of a deity that we do not know and are not familiar with at all, and cannot initially identify. Unfortunately, as if often the case, deities don’t usually say “Oh, by the way, I’m Apollon, and here’s my calling card,” and instead we’re left to puzzle out who this newly encountered being happened to be. We are usually able to do it with a bit of research, consulting our co-religionists, or even divination (which can often be the most useful method of all!). And, ninety-nine-thousand-nine-hundred-and-ninety-nine times out of a hundred thousand, we find “Oh, that’s Zeus!” or “Oh, that’s Artemis!” or “Oh, that’s an unusual aspect of Aphrodite,” or what-have you. Even if it is an unprecedented aspect of a particular deity, usually the particular deity’s signature is on the whole experience in some fashion or other. And, thus, what we had perhaps initially thought was an experience that was uniquely our own and had no connection to anything anyone else had ever done suddenly becomes a connection a history and a community and a cultus that has existed for a very long time indeed. Whatever our own personal perceptions of or spin on the matter might be, we have just engaged in syncretism: we have linked our own practice and experience to something wider and more established and well-known. And, there’s nothing wrong with this. Even in the case of having entirely new deities, as I’ve been dealing with for more than a year now, these deities emerge within a particular context–even if, as in the case of the Tetrad, it is a promiscuously syncretistic context. However, it is also possible that an entirely new practice, pantheon, divine being or set of beings, or interpretation of something already existing can emerge in one’s experience, where the syncretistic dimensions of personal spirituality and wider communal and established cultus may not be as influential or as important as in other cases. However, for the majority of history, there have been at least some connections where these things are concerned.
If you want SUCCESS AND POWER in Jesus for His work and will then it will demand discipline.
People are hard.
He is the most religious candidate in the race and believes all laws must confirm with God’s laws. He believes all rights come from God. He stated that “unless we honour God, our country will not be held up by God and protected in any way, whether it’s from foreign aggression or from problems here with in.”
First...hugs...Master always says never too many hugs, and His hugs are real big bear type hugs. He then showed me what He had accomplished on His remodel project while I was away. Then it was kneeling and naked time, with Master for some "just us" time. Master reclaiming all of me, and me reclaiming my submission. Of course, Master can never resist some nipple play (torture), and I am getting used to it....
God’s wrath could have been poured out then and there with the ship being broken up by the storm. But for the sake of Paul many lives were spared. But for the sake of the Spirit indwelt Body of Christ today the world is being spared judgment. This is seen in 2 Thessalonians 2:7. “For the mystery of iniquity doth already work; only he who now letteth will let, until he be taken out of the way.
Fighting = 15 bucks
Who The better you bet UK
It is an unpleasant experience watching low class people abuse themselves in a prurient business. I am sorely disappointed with Anderson. Everyone is entitled a fumble here and there, but Boogie Nights is such unpleasant viewing, callig it a fumble is an insult to football.
GEORGE TOWN — An operator of a workshop which was allegedly torn down by the Municipal Council of Penang Island failed in his attempt to present a replica of the workshop, a toilet and a bulldozer to Penang Chief Minister Lim Guan Eng on the first anniversary of the alleged incident in Jelutong here.
Get your entries in before May 26th! I will draw a winner that night!
Jane Eileen Josiah, 47, Bellmore, N.Y.
Back to tangling, I did manage to do two tiles. In the first I used Sanibelle and Buttercup. The second I just went where my string took me and then drew the auras. I’m not sure if I like the second one, but it is what it is, and I like it a little better after shading it.
Therein lies the beauty of the laboratory. In reality, you cannot fail a laboratory or an experiment. Granted, processes and procedures can be fine tuned to reduce the impact of the exterior environment, but after much preparation and training, this is hardly a factor. Rather, the lab shows that evaluation of the results cannot definitively say whether or not you were successful or a failure. Granted, results that support the hypothesis help indicate whether or not the proposed idea was true, but results that don’t support don’t necessarily negate the idea. Rather, it begs a rephrasing or rethinking of the proposed idea, in order to adapt to the circumstances that are present. Science does not fail the human thought, rather, it acts as a professor, leading the train of thought along the right tracks, hopefully arriving at the definitive answer.
5 pink paper roses
Joy (the mother of this team) designs realistic images, while I (Judy aka/daughter) love the “fun side of life”, and create images with cartoon flair. Having these two complimenting styles have enabled Digi Doodle Shop to offer just about any type of stamp. Plus, we also offer “custom made stamps”, and blog designs. Our best work comes from request, so if you don’t see what you’re looking for, just send us an email and before long you’ll see it in the shop.
Tiff recently asked Joe to take all the money she saved to the bank and get all one-dollar-bills with it. He gladly did this for her and I was so grateful to him. Town is a good hour drive round trip and for him to take time out of his busy day to do this for his daughter warmed my heart. Here is Tiff feeling the true abundance of her money.
Deleuze rejects the division noumena-phenomena, though there is still something of this division in his own partition of reality in the representational and the sub-representational. He likewise rejects certain aspects of the transcendental argument, if not its form qua condition. If some sort of truth and knowledge is at stake in the representational, this concerns only those sorts of truth or knowledge (the interesting, the important, etc.) that can be had under an illusion, as he, at times, calls the representational. Although Deleuze goes on to outline the common features of the creative disciplines, he does so not principally with an eye to securing the validity and truth of their judgments but such that the subject better understands the part of illusion or falsification in any theory that pretends to knowledge, truth, universality, etc. In the end, the representational and its constituent elements retain the distinction of “conditions of creativity” but are no longer that which conditions truth and knowledge in their more traditional sense.
How's your novel going? Are you taking the time to breathe, to let your protagonist breathe?
It's easy for me, it should be easy for you.
I've watched so many SMAP videos over the last few months, and this is not the first time I see them get emotional in public. But the fact that every single member gets affected in this particular video is sort of adorable. You just want to give them all a hug!
The easier something is to use the more it is used.
PS... My above mentioned sister-in-law let me know she cooks her pinto beans in leftover roast juices... Sounds yummy! =) Think I'll try it out!
Cupcakes Take The Cake Meetup
1 ½ cups heavy whipping cream
I mean, how could there still be life in them after all this time?
began sticking Ashley with needles, telling her it was vitamins, and feeding her lines about needing her help to ‘entertain’ his clients. The needles contained heroin and other illicit drugs. Drugs he used to keep her under control and compliant with his ‘friends’. He had Ashley moved to a sub-standard flat with several other young women, as young as 14. Ashley lived in the rat infested shack, drinking and shooting heroin into her veins for several years.
I don’t think anyone should tell you what you should and should not read. Of course, the Books Everyone Should Read lists don’t tell you what not to read, but they certainly point you in a certain direction.
They leave next Tuesday and this mother and dad are excited and have heavy hearts at the same time. I know Lindsey's parents are feeling the same as Tony and I are. Their house is empty - everything is in storage (imagine all those new wedding gifts), and they are SO anxious to leave. They are packed and ready to go. I know they'll miss all their family back home, but this is something they've both wanted to do for a long time. And it's an awesome time in their young lives to go! We wouldn't feel NEAR as comfortable with their decision if they didn't already have some good Christian people over there to welcome them and help them to get on their feet!
“Wow! Your mother is a very charming woman.”
This article appeared in The Independent today, 26 April 2012. It was written by Health Editor Jeremy Laurance. According to my word count software, there are 529 words in the article. Of those, only 24 words provide a rebuttal -- actually it is only 14 words, but I'm being generous by giving them the whole paragraph. That is about 9% of the article, if you were wondering. Nine-Fucking-Percent! And this is why I really, really, really hate the mainstream media. No, really. They are not independent. They are not fair and unbiased. They promote an agenda of sensationalised hate on a daily basis. And we let them do it.
Source: Cuisine at Home
The word is power. In the Book of Genesis, God creates the world with his word. In the New Testament book of John, God is the word (Word – logos). The written word first began as a way to record trade and administrative matters and later evolved into a means of political control. The Persian King Cyrus’s famous cylinder codifies his power over every other ruler on earth. From the earliest human civilizations comes this tradition of the word, especially the written word, as power in itself.
I've never been a huge fan of coconut. I started making these one day after making some custard and having egg whites leftover. I didn't want to throw them out so I searched around and came across this recipe on AllRecipes.com. These are very easy to make, quick to put together and were very good. This time I had made these to giveaway to some family. Make sure you keep them in an airtight container otherwise they dry up and get hard. I had put them in some cellophane bags and they had hardened up. You can remedy this by popping it in the microwave for about 10 seconds. They are great snack for kids too. These would also be great dipped in some chocolate or with some drizzled on top.
EFVGI Blog (efvgiblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
7 1/2 yards of dotted Swiss fabric, for $2.00!!
You are the dancing queen
Final Verdict: With expensive drinks, crappy music, and a space not made for working, I don’t imagine that I’ll be coming back to Thor anytime soon—which is not to say it’s a bad café, but just not what I’m looking for.
Frannie's friends, I think, are both interesting characters, and really add to the book. You've got Frannie best friend, who's also her competition at practically everything. And then there's the sweet and quiet one, who's nonstop trying to keep the other two from bickering nonstop. These are really the only two girls who Frannie is in touch with, and even then she likes to say it's because they stay out of her business. Frannie is still traumatized and guilty from her brother's death, ten years earlier. But I think both girls slowly help break Frannie loose of her ties, whether she wants to believe it or not.
Traitor's Kiss
I ordered a cheeseburger off of the Billy's menu. I'm not sure it's quite as good as its reputation would suggest. It could have been a bit juicier, but I did enjoy it. The french fries that accompanied it were not so good. They were crispy, but had a dry texture. I like my fries to feel a little greasy.
Seventy-one percent of the IMB’s budget is spent on missionary support, including housing, salaries, medical care and children’s education. It averages $43,800 annually per missionary.
I started a new blog to publish the columns I write for The Chatsworth Times each week. Go Follow it and leave feedback each week.
You can read the rest of Louise Penny’s post here (it’s too long for me to re-type all of it) but what a thrill to be mentioned in the same breath with such great authors! Thanks so much, Louise, very much appreciated!
I suppose I never took to the time to understand what was really happening to the field, to each and ever person in life. The varying details come in so fast and so ever-changing I rarely go back to remember what we had just seen and try to understand it more fully. And then someone shows up in the field and your understanding of what transpired the month prior gets kicked open wide.
Do not allow them to use it, it is yours.
MY GIVEAWAY IS...
Anyway, here's the picture. Prepare to laugh yourself silly.
It's kind of hard for liberals and progressives to argue that President Obama's actions as demonstrated here are anything other than wrong. On the other hand, I kind of feel like this borders on criminal- it's the utter misuse of government resources to support a person's political ambitions and fly friends and family around the nation in taxpayer paid luxury.
Anyone know where I can get a dustbuster?
Thanks for inviting me to pour out my heart. I hope you liked what you read, you trust the feelings I type, and you can figure out how to handle the love of an emotional, witty, stubbornly opinionated, loyal, affectionate, half-crazy, OCD redhead.
My entire four hours was one overarching meditation. When Jamie and the kids and the dog returned, I was quite a new person. I had been growing increasingly testy over the past few weeks, but now I felt calm and recollected.
Although I haven't written that many blog posts yet and as such have not shared "117 little miracles" I figured that each of us has had at least that many to begin with in our lives, so it's a good round number to begin calculating from. I think some people who read here may think that some of the things I look at as "miracles" are just mere coincidences ... if you understand that I don't think ANYTHING is a coincidence then you can enjoy reading without critiquing.
most of my strips i embossed using my cuttlebug machine and some embossing folders. i sanded some of the areas to give a worn out look. and don't forget the sewing on the edges for some added texture and colour.
Živo dice:
In the mouth with a caracal pinch,
Zombie King, I'd say is Jonathan Maberry. His Rot & Ruin and Dust & Decay books are wonderfully rich. They don't display an 'us or them' mentality to zombies, more like 'they were us' There's pathos and humanity and even dignity in zombies. They don't just represent the other. In fact, the zombies aren't even really the bad guys in these books. Definitely pick up the series if you haven't already.
Man, that brings back some memories of my wild youth. I remember seeing these guys when I was in high school. Let me propose that this song be an anthem for all progressives who yearn to feel a sweet sun shower.
absence … makes the heart grow fonder
Also, have you had a look at the beautiful prize that's up for grabs for a lucky participant of the sketch contest? Feast your eyes on this...
Have a wonderful time stampin'
The other presentation was about several kinds of birds of prey. The presenter brought about 5 different types of birds including a falcon, hawk, and an owl. We enjoyed learning more about these fascinating birds.
Do you think these rules pertain to today’s society? Do you engage in gossip? What do you think would happen if everyone followed these rules?
In addition, we should write:
Arizona v Countrywide / Bank of America lawsuit
Eva, is it important that you appreciate an artist when you are asked to do a photo-shoot?
It also had math questions – the kind that has the train leaving the station at a certain time going at a speed of 216 mph and it meets another train about 12 minutes after leaving the station…my eyes glazed over and I almost wrote “who the hell cares” as my answer.
Perhaps it is little surprise, therefore, that James Masing’s wife is listed as one of the shareholders and Directors of Untang Jaya, in the official register of the Construction Industry Development Board.
“Good, good,” said Reginald. “Listen, we should probably talk about The Plan. I shouldn’t like to have things veering out of all control because someone forgot what they were supposed to do.”
so it will take half the time
What do you think are key questions to ask in the early stages of dating?
Clearsight was beginning to hurt, just the first fingertip of pressure on his forehead. This far from any Sherim, he had an hour, perhaps, before he faced another burnout. The Axtli moved again, and there again was the impression of a short, powerful leg flowing forward to take a step-
It’s not a hobby Phil, it’s a cause.
The inside cover has a note from the editor, which is rather sweet. If only more authors took the time to acknowledge their fans. Then a contents table helpfully guides you through the meat and bones of the novel. I wish Lord Of The Rings had something like this so I could have skipped all those damn descriptions about travelling and gotten to the bit where that bald mental kid falls into a volcano (oops, spoiler alert).
Melt buttery spread and put aside to cool.
6. Men love women….
3″ Elastic: 3/8 yard was enough for me. If you can find 4″ elastic, even better!
Our Sunday roast is also a hit. Plus, from £8.90, you’d be hard-pressed to find a better one for less.
The best thing for him to do
In a large bowl mix bread flour with rest of sugar, salt, butter and rub the butter with hand so that it gets mixed well with flour. To this add yeast, milk and rest of water to form soft, sticky dough. Transfer the dough into the buttered container and chill overnight in fridge.
After another 2 minutes, add the fried chicken legs and wrap them with the fried onion and capsicum. Stir fry for another 2 minutes and switch off the flame.
Keep cooking until mixture begins to thicken. 3 minutes, maybe? Keep whisking.
Would really appreciate it. Just want to create something that can help make a difference in other people and maybe even help them with life choices of their own.
Now you have two weeks to show us your creations and join our blog hop. We can’t wait so see you work.
that speeds along nicely. Plus, I'm doing it with a purple pen,
Beautiful objects, including historical and contemporary art, textiles and manuscripts, bring to life the profound spiritual significance of the sacred rituals that have remained unchanged since the Prophet Muhammad’s time in the 7th century AD.
“Autism is a lifelong developmental disability that affects how a person communicates with, and relates to, other people. It also affects how they make sense of the world around them.”
It may be understandable that some people want to head off such a catastrophe, either by not reporting the attacks in this race war, or not identifying the race of those attacking, or by insisting that the attacks were not racially motivated -- even when the attackers themselves voice anti-white invective as they laugh at their bleeding victims.
boxed and frozen
“Iran is continuing with its nuclear program without let-up; it is enriching uranium to a high level of 20 percent while grossly ignoring the demands of the international community.”
Trust me. When you return and look at your editor's words twenty-four hours (or more) later, you will be stunned to find that somehow they've changed. They're not calling you a talentless hack after all. They're not saying the book is terrible. And all the quick fixes that sprang into your head on the first read now feel a bit hasty, and as if they rather missed the point. Whatever your initial reaction was, you will be profoundly glad you waited before you acted on it.
Like newborn babies, crave pure spiritual milk, so that by it you may grow up in your salvation, now that you have tasted that the Lord is good.
Now...about that heaven on a stick!!! I am not a big ice cream fan. I enjoy it occasionally, and only certain kinds...like Ben and Jerry's Chunky Monkey or Pistaccio, Pistaccio or even Cherry Garcia. I also am not one of those who, once I find a great flavor, will eat it every single night (like my husband!) I will savor the flavor only once a week......while I'm watching The Bachelor! That is my weekly indulgence, splurge, treat, whatever you want to call it! Last season my flavor was Ben and Jerry's Chunky Monkey....I would eat half the container one week and save the other half for the next week. This season...I'm so excited because I have found a new love! Magnum Ice Cream Bars! OMG ya'll, these are soooo delicious I just can't wait for tonight! I have only tried one flavor and that is the Double Caramel. Now let me tell you what this treat is all about...the vanilla ice cream is so smooth and creamy and it's covered with a thin layer of chocolate...which is covered by a nice layer of caramel which is covered by a thick layer of chocolate....Belgium chocolate to be exact! Not the waxy, stick to your teeth chocolate that you usually find on ice cream bars...this stuff is good! There are 6 different flavors. I've bought all mine at Food Lion or Publix but they carry them at Walmart and Target too as well as other grocery stores and here is a link to a $1.00 off coupon from Target...I just printed mine. Now hurry because the coupon expires May 31 and you know you're gonna want one while you watch The Bachelor tonight!!! Now ya'll run on out to your local grocer or Target and grab a box...you'll be so glad you did! Now don't forget...9:00... I'll be on my couch...with Magnum ice cream bar in hand! Toodles!
Whether it's improving your credit score, giving up cigarettes for good, getting in shape, buying a house, raising children, or even planting an heirloom tomato garden, I know you have thoughts, opinions, stories, and experiences that will positively impact someones life.
Unsocial.
McALLEN
Every so often, I get into situations that makes me wonder if I am secretly being filmed for a sitcom. Kind of like the Truman Show, except more dramatically funny.
“The consulate general immediately intervened with the concerned authorities for his early clearance, which was done within 75 minutes of his arrival,” it said. “Khan thereafter left the airport. The same evening, USCBP authorities, through an email to the consulate general conveyed their profound apology for the incident.
Mogwai – May Nothing but Happiness Come Your Way – Come on Die Young (1999)
“It’s OK, Stevon. You can tell me. I’m your friend right?”
Though Paterson, unlike Spitzer, does not come from a real estate family, it's unlikely that Paterson would make an agency like the ESDC a priority during the remainder of the term, which ends in 2010.
We all make them....you know, New Year's Resolutions. But do we actually keep up with them? I for one am guilty of making them and then not following through, or only doing them for a couple of weeks. I have made only resolution for this year (yeah, right), well one that I am seriously going to try and keep up with that is. That resolution is to be a blogger and post more of my scrapbooking layouts and projects that I complete. I also want to do some tutorials. I do have a lot of layouts that I have done that I have not posted, so I think I will put them on a schedule to post ;o) Boy, can ya'll smell the smoke? That smoke is the wheels in my head turning, lol.
ALWAYS SOMETHING THERE TO REMIND ME
Through a miscommunication with the groomer I came out looking like this:
And I guess fear is what I am feeling a bit lately. And this is related to going full time at work. I am really worried how things are going to go externally when full time and am still not sure in my gut how this is going to pan out with the Directors.
Hope noone gets a concussion, and that noone is paralyzed for life like Darryl Stingley. Lets go NFL.
Utterances inside his head
January 5, 2011 — Dean Henderson
The second look is a pair of 7 for all Mankind white jeans paired with a beige poncho by One Teaspoon and adorable Alden Rae bracelets to finish off the outfit. Perfection! :)
Happy Friday friends! Ever since the kiddos started back to school last week, I have been trying to steer myself onto the road of organization and cleaning. And let my tell you, sisters, that road isn't always smooth. I sit here and ponder...why can I not keep my house picked up and company ready? The desire is there...what is the problem? I figured out that I am very easily distracted (something shiny?? Where?) If I even sit down at this stinkin' computer in the morning, hours can easily slip away! (Pinterest anyone?) I also L.O.V.E. to read. I will sometimes bribe myself by "allowing" myself to read my book for 30 minutes if I do this, this and this first.
Still, it appears to me that essentially John McGinness is complaining about relatively the same thing that we here in Foothill Farms are disenchanted with; allocation of resources. Even back when the economy was bustling and the Department had plenty of resources to go around their response times to areas of better class were substantially better and even more so when it related to responding to the harm of a business. I guess the million dollar question here is, “Why are some people and some properties worth more than others?”. Followed by, “Why have we placed the value of the American Dollar over the value of the individual?”
It’s time to relax and TAKE A DUMP.
Gonna Take My Guitar – Bobby Hodge
Immediately as they finished I scooped up Maevie and rocked her in my arms. She was still sobbing a bit and doing that little gasp as she tried to catch her breath. In those few moments, I felt defeated. I felt sad. My mind started to wander and of course, I imagined the worse case scenario. Bry being the calm one, started talking it out to me. He rationalized each potential outcome, giving worst case to best case and everything he could think of in between. Before the doctor came back to speak to us, I was calmer.
Morgan and Maxamillion Godfrey, now Raines.
Fasting Sugar - 102
We encourage you all to play along, and to enter your card in the weekly draw for a $15 gift voucher to the MFT Boutique. Simply follow the sketch and create a card or other paper creation. You may use any stamps and supplies that you wish. Each week, a keyword is assigned to the sketch. All you need to do to enter, is upload your card to the gallery at SCS, and enter the given keyword in the keyword box, during the upload process. After the deadline, we randomly choose a winner from that week's entries and the winner will receive a $15 gift voucher. If the winning card uses MFT stamps, the participant will earn a $5 bonus, for a total of a $20 gift voucher! That is up to $100 per month in prizes, JUST for playing along!
Helm’s journey would take him from where he was born in Arkansas to Canada in 1959 when he was invited to join rockabilly Ronnie Hawkins’ group ” The Hawkes” already known though the south and a favorite in Canada when Hawkins decided to move to Toronto. There he would meet some other Canadian born musicians and co-found what would become one of the most prolific bands of rock music history. Simply naming the group, The Band.
As is often the case in Paris, the museum was just as beautiful as the art. What an incredible building the Musee de somethin' somethin' Jacques somethin' Andre is. (?) It used to be someone's house and I think they had a lot of money. I'm an endless fountain of information.
I, who pushed your clinging body away
This morning Jackson was worried that he hadn't told Santa thank you.
Panasonic Lumix DMC-FZ5 Review
This effort, called Operation Eagle Eye II, kicks off the department’s campaign statewide at various fairs and other large public gatherings, to ensure that parolees wearing the state-of-the-art technology don’t violate their terms of parole and pose a potential risk to public safety. Plans include GPS monitoring at more than a dozen county and city events through the fall months.
I prefer the black ink of the 0.7mm over the blue ink of the 0.5mm, so thus it garners the silver medal. The shade of black is still a little off, and I'm no fan of the FriXion eraser. It smudges the paper too much compared to the traditional eraser models.
As you know I chose technical analysis as my battle ground. I eliminated nearly every indicator off my charts and now only look at price and volume candles. I do use some of the most common techniques such as trend lines, wave principal, and Fibonacci concepts in my trading. I use them only as a guide, without cluttering my charts with those lines. I encourage new students that I work with to use Simple Moving Averages on their charts as a visual guide to speed up the analysis process for them. But I do not, and don’t want anyone else to take a trade based solely on a Moving Average or any single indicator.
We did however get the required information; the dates, real estate prices and the names of the rich and famous residents of the Manhattan waterfront apartments.
Choose your own earning period (You can only choose one)
J E T S ~ Jokes End This Season?
"It's not you, it's the other drivers I'm worried about," I said.
After further inspection the midwife said that my placenta was completely intact and that she didn't think that any membranes had stayed inside me. She didn't think I needed to go to the hospital. I'd been prepared and willing to go, but it was so nice not to have to! The midwife was still concerned though that I might hemorrhage and so she gave me some medicine to help prevent it and watched me really carefully. The second part of the miracle has been that I've hardly had any bleeding during my postpartum recovery, which is remarkable considering what my placenta went through! It has been such a testimony to me of the power of priesthood blessings. I know that without that blessing things may have turned out much differently.
Chipotle is my restaurant soul mate.
Title: Bernie
The equation shared by Shah Rukh Khan and Salman Khan needs no introduction. And talking about the equation shared by SRK and the other significant Khan of Bollywood – Aamir – all we can say is that they have never been too close or even buddies, for that matter!
Limits to tolerance
Rolywholyover to theanyspacewhatever: John Cage's Compositions for Museums, or Relational in Retrospect
6. I cannot tell you the name of child A’s dad as he informs me that to do so would blow his cover and that would have cataclysmic implications for the British economy. I am torn between doing right by you and right by the country. Please advise.
WWE Extreme Rules
Oh it's scandalous! It's scandalous!
once told me I could ...
This is the card open, with its self-forming base. It may look familiar because I used part of a failed chevron from the other day for the popped-up part. I just trimmed off what I could and stuck it to the white piece, making sure to align it so it was all above the platform. It was this white piece that took forever - I had no clue what to do on it.
“Oh, that's OK... I want to do it myself... I prefer that.”
OK, so I have figured out why I couldn't edit properly. I needed to upgrade my editing tool for blogger...did that and now, as I type this, it looks totally different. That's cool though. I didn't really want to abandon my blog.
I then pressed the tracks selection and decided to start with 'A' and work through them alphabetically for a few moments. It's quite intriguing to know what, of dozens of years of music, the iPod would decide was first. It turned out to be 'The A Team' by Ed Sheeran, which is quite a recent track - I wonder if they know its probably the first track on many iPods?
Rather than letting that motion of thought continue on its path, I tasked myself with purposefully thinking about things I was looking forward to. While I shared some of these with you during that week of reflection, the exercise itself helped me to continuously ask myself, “What are you looking forward to?”
Speaking of my sister she picked two fabulous recipes to make this week! I will be adding these recipes to the list of keepers!
So I tried canning chicken several weeks ago but I'm only just now getting around to blogging about it. Pesky Spring Break vacations and such have kept me from my blog :)
Other new tests for the early detection of ovarian cancer are still undergoing development. One of the most promising is a blood test for asymptomatic early stage ovarian cancer.
It likes to feast before the worms,
That no matter how good a friend is,
Have a beautiful, wonder-full weekend, y'all!
Here is Sam anxiously awaiting the upcoming boat ride...ok I was anxious. She was excited to be playing in the garage.
Bag of sea shells
04. The Shadow of Your Smile (film The Sandpiper) 1968
The added in cats and dogs makes the story charming and sweet.
And tag 8:
Two days ago, the most bustling portion of Fifth Avenue was closed on a busy Wednesday for the St. Patrick’s Day parade, undoubtedly annoying thousands of locals interrupted in their daily commutes and hurting numerous businesses. Every year, the same occurs for such events as the NYC Marathon, the 5-Boro Bike Ride, street fairs and so on. Yet somehow, life seems to go on. Meanwhile, that five-minute annoyance to you often means a LOT to the people who benefited from it.
O come, let us adore Him,
Well my friends, that's exactly how the combination of and onion tart an bloggers could be so damn awesome, that I stayed in in Delaware for ten hours knowing I had to go to work the next morning!
I tell myself this is but a period of precession.
It has been quite the year of racing! And it’s only April! This season started off poorly as I have had to deal with a lot of nagging injuries which seem to plague me each month since December. I have started to address the problems and hopefully things will improve. On a more positive note I have managed a PR in 3 of the 4 events this year. I thought I PR’d at Safari Park but it seems I was about 20 seconds off.
in other licensing news, i can barely wait to share the news with you about what's coming in 2011. it's big, like pee in your pants, can hardly believe it big.
Sometime during breakfast, the waiter brought Avery a special treat - her own lighted cupcake.
Think you left me broken down
I can honestly say that it feels so amazing afterwards, even the next day.
“All children are jerks during holidays, important events, and moments of pure brilliance on the part of their parents. There is a secret society of children that gathers together while we are drinking our wine in the evenings after they’re in bed. The children all gather in the astral plane and plan ways to torment their parents on days that we like to tell ourselves are ‘all about family (ie: the children).’ All memory of this secret society is removed from our brains the moment we produce our own offspring. Tru fax.”
As you will notice, I have had to move a few things to make give Lythan room on the table to work, so one stack of boxes that normally live on the table have been moved to a little fold up table in the corner and my box of Promarkers is now on the top of the filing cabinet for the time being, until I get around to putting everything back.
The fact that 'members' of the EDL are pushing the EDL towards POLITICAL goals as opposed to solely opposing Islamic extremism means:
And men fight for Home, and all it stands for (wife, children, parents, grandparents, familiar roads, favorite ponds, well trodden woods, childhood memories by a brook, football games in the autumn, old barns barely of use and the very dirt upon which it all stands.)
So, I haven’t been wasting my time completely while I’m not blogging. At least I’ve begun working on one of my life’s biggest goals.
Perhaps this is why so much of architecture writing today, both on blogs and elsewhere, so willfully crosses over into science fiction: if architecture literally is the design and proposal of a different world—one that might exist tomorrow, next year, next decade—then it is conceptually coextensive with the genre of scifi.
However, I do recommend them for certain items: bags, scarves, jewelry (i.e., items that don’t require getting naked to try them on). Thus, one of my favorite shops in Paris is the accessories boutique “Pour” located at 23 rue Berthollet in the 5th arrondissement. It’s small, off the beaten track and carries unique pieces that make perfect gifts for you or your friends.
It's a new month and time for our second class in Colour.
Hi there! MY BLOG IS SO DEAD. I MEAN, I DIDN'T UPDATE AS OFTEN, MY GOODNESS. AHAHA!
He goes on to share:
And then, the saddest thing. Comparing the two goats and their evidence of pregnancy, one was far larger and more uddery than the other, and I was starting to worry. So I wasn’t totally surprised when I found that one of them had miscarried. I’ll spare you the gruesome details, enough to report that the doe is now fine and her spirits back to normal.
Normally one has to be careful with inkjet prints because they are not waterproof.
Tho’ stretched from sky to sky.
Concentrate on manifesting these things in your life without harming anyone else.
Come back and link up on Friday, July 8th.
Note: the above paragraphs are just suggestions and methods that I use myself personally. It’s completely up to you whether you want to get a credit card or not, whichever way works for you at saving money. If you don’t think you can handle being on time with your payments or be responsible with a credit card, then please do not sign up for one. It can only hurt you more than help.
It's comforting to know that not everything changes with time. Take a look at this sweet video I came across. It was taken at the Brooklyn Botanical Gardens on Easter Sunday in the early1960's.
Venting over
All-in-all to have eight players drafted and at least seven sign free agent contracts isn’t bad. The Tide’s draft total was obviously top heavy due to four players going in the first round, but I’m not totally surprised that the free agents wound up as free agents. In fact, the only real surprise – other than Upshaw falling out of the first round – is that Smelley was drafted.
Security at the contemporary times has become reason for concern for every stream of business and individuals worldwide. With the rising crime levels and increasing terrorism, people and business are investing heavily in security systems to save their property and their own lives. HD security cameras are essential enough because crime doesn’t have an address and thus it can happen anywhere, at any place and time.
Leftists today also tend to regard consumerism as gross (or say they do as they drive off in their Volvos).
After all is said and done, I really, really, really like this dress. It looks exactly like what I envisioned and I love that it sorta looks vintage. I absolutely love the fabric, the green looks much better in person and I love the polka dots. I also love the green and red combo and this is how I intend to wear the dress, at least with that belt if not the shoes.
Remove from heat and let set. Just before serving, stir with a large fork to mix the rice with the meats. Top with the green onions and serve with hot red pepper sauce if desired and lots of hot, crusty French bread.
There’s actually a precedent in nature, too. There are parasites that mind-control, for lack of a better term, their hosts. There’s one called the sacculina [which is a really creepy parasitic that takes over and castrates crabs]. It’s pretty horrific. There’s also a type of fungus called cordyceps that infects insects, particularly ants, and what they’ll do is they’ll mind control the ant to alter its behavior to go to the highest branch possible so that it’s highly visible, so it can be eaten by something else, and that helps the fungus spread. There are other parasitic organisms like that that kind of alter [other organisms’] behavior and make them zombielike, for lack of a better word, and it’s pretty horrific. The zombie microbe, or whatever it is, is harmless until it has something to control.
I started knitting a jumper for me in November, hoping I would get in done in time to wear it before the winter is out. I got the pattern out of an old Rowan knitting magazine and liked its simplicity. Its called 'Bond' and was designed by Kim Hargreaves. Since finishing it a week or two ago I have worn it almost constantly, its sooo warm and cosy! Here it is, the finished item...
Ø Be unemployed and/or have a low income
Mark Gray, president and founder of Brick 26, is a school principal in Baldwin and not a veteran. But he says he has a strong belief that civilians “still have a chance to serve their country, by helping those who served us overseas.”
Hairbase: Discord Designs- Ripley
6. Sinking Friendships
Now you tell me two ancient old Chinese Philosophers from China can figure it out, why can’t you?
During my winter beach walks along the coast of South Carolina, I frequently discover starfish that have been washed in by the tide and deposited on the teeming wet sand. More often than not, the starfish I encounter have died and are destined to be picked up by collectors or reclaimed by the next high tide. From time to time, however, I discover live starfish wriggling just beneath the bubbling sand or trapped in a tidal pool. When that occurs, I always pick up the starfish and hurl it back into the ocean. It's a practice I've followed since reading Loren Eiseley's fine essay, The Star Thrower, many years ago. I don't know whether I have ever actually saved any starfish lives, but the mere act of providing some with a second chance has saved a part of my own.
Ignore them. It's as easy as that. But, funnily enough, not everyone does.
Yes, you think, Rosaria starts her conversations by referring to this view, from her cottage in the Northwest.And if I were to orate my story today, it would be full of connections to this place. We are, after all, part of our environment. We live and breathe and eat the foods that grow here.
Thank you George the Lad and Rose H. The unidentified flower in my last post is indeed a Pheasant Berry (what a fantastic name). Sherri B. I thought it was some kind of fushia too. Looks very much like it, doesn't it?
Not sure how this came to be, but it is certainly a new figure right out the packaging, and that type of packaging is not something you can open then close again without it being extremely noticeable.
Have you noticed? Women seem riddled with guilt. And it’s hard to know if guilt is legitimate or simply a product of our imaginations. After all, should we really feel guilty about things over which we have no control?
The point I'm making that it's always hard to do the best work you can. Stuff is hard when it's at the limit of your ability - that's what something being hard means (unless it's too hard, in which case it's beyond said limit). And if you're going to publish your writing, you've got to do the best work you can.
He ran off more biographical details.
The start of a week usually brings a clean house. Well, although the house has been cleaned tip top to basement bottom, it appears as though it was never cleaned with the torrent of toys littered all over, the superheros neighboring the matchbox cars and the shiny red and yellow building blocks mixed among the wooden train pieces. Along with a "clean" house, I also typically kick the week off scrambling to get to my pilates class while a friend watches the boys. It's the only hour of sanity that I have in my week and I spent it torturing my abs. In this particular week, I spend the better part of a day shoveling out of 4 inches of snow from a blustery Great Lakes storm. And this is just the start of the week. I am already mentally fatigued and I know that I am feeling run down since a dull, back ache and sinus congestion started days previously. But this turns ugly.
After waiting three days to find out who they’d be facing in the 2nd Round, the Nashville Predators were finally given an answer about 20 minutes ago when the #3 Phoenix Coyotes knocked out the #6 Chicago Blackhawks 4-0 in Game 6 of the 1st Round.
These will be perfect for summer or parties! My kids love dipping in it already. If you any questions..please email my :
All I know is I have to learn to stay away from these dangerous sharks
Selling on a direct basis to retail chains was my first experience with “top – down selling” techniques. Our goal was to introduce our company and ourselves to high-level buying influencers, often called “C-level” buyers. We needed to be positively positioned with them for future selling within the account. These people would have titles such as CEO, COO, CFO, President or owner of the corporation.
Snortin’ an’ stampin’ ‘cause they won’t fit--
I have two more products from Organic Indulgence to share with you in this post. I love the brand because they are super affordable and have great smelling products! In this post I'll share with you their Lip Butter - which, once again, my son stole from me, lol - and their Foaming Hand Wash.
“Currently, no charges have been brought,” Garrison said.
Summer is a slow time in New York, which leaves me a little freedom to work on our fall new designs, materials, colors, etc.... I just recently had dinner with a Benjamin Moore creative executive, and with wine helping us, we had so many laughs and at the end of dinner we realized that we actually sat 3 hours at the table! A good thing I train it into town.
A few notes: The pictures really don't do this bread justice - it's wonderfully moist and flavorful - but it does have a tendency to dry out if over baked or left out on the counter. I like my quick breads moist and tender so I err on the side of underbaking and make sure to take the bread out of the pan before it has completely cooled. Keep it covered or well wrapped, and if it does dry out a little, a few seconds in the microwave before serving will freshen it right up!
“Of course it is. I do not think we culd have made a fire as quickly otherwise and then we would have been cold. And you would not have learned so much about making proper fires, either.”
Scribe Junior: Mummy, what's this book about?
“I looked seriously anorexic,” they said.
The weather broke on Thursday, just a day late. I volunteered at Cradles 2 Crayons, which I try to do once a week. It's a great organization that I urge you to check out. Unfortunately, there are only 2 chapters, one in Boston and one here. I know several of the regular volunteers and we were getting together to re-organize a section. I love these women, they are so much more real than the people with whom I worked on the yearbook (remember the lady and her dog I told you about?). We shared ideas and listened to each other. I had to leave before they finished but one of the volunteers sent me an e mail with an update on what they did. See, how hard is it to act like an adult? And, how much more pleasant?
This is that message.
'Well,' the logger said, 'he may have access to all wisdom, but he sure don't know nothin' about bear huntin! Is the bait holding up, or do we need to go back to Seattle and get another one?'
But when it comes to my life, my writing and finding inspiration, because I don't believe inspiration is strictly designated to only the writer in me, I feel I also need to be better about nurturing and inspiring every part of my life, not just the writer side. Trying to be a person who is more intentional about finding the right mojo for my life, by making decisions that will help push me to fully live out my dreams and potential. I think its very important that we each find a positive source of energy that we can feed from in our daily lives. For me that source comes in a variety of forms. One being music, another is films, and the most important one being, AUTHENTIC people. And for me those are people who are motivated in their lives (which is one of many reasons I love writers), they possess a genuine kindness and desire to share with others, and are people who in their way enhance your life instead of drains it.
I wore my new top to work today to brighten the grey day. It's so comfy, fits in all the right places and hides the right bits too. This won't be the last of these tunics I'll be making.
With these words, Jesus speaks of outward versus inward religious practices. Giving, prayer, and fasting are most often associated with religion and, in the following section of the sermon, Jesus speaks again of the inner heart versus outward forms. In Matthew 6:2-4, He speaks of giving. In Matthew 6:5-15, He speaks of prayer, and in 6:16-18, He speaks of fasting. His treatment of all three topics is the same: if you have the outward form only or if the outward form focuses attention on you, the public acclaim that you receive—real or imagined—is all the benefit you will derive.
Our team recently competed at the state level at Worcester Polytechnic Institute in Worcester, MA. WPI houses this event each year, hosting the best teams in Massachusetts. Our team earned our spot by coming in first place at the regional competition at Beverly High School just two weeks before. In Worcester the team earned second place out of
Funnily enough when this photo was taken in the park we saw many small children walking past and the occasional adult with ice cream cones piled high with scoops of brightly coloured ice cream. Amongst the vanilla and chocolate were bright pink, minty green, and a rather lurid blue.
I felt a little discouraged, but not yet defeated. As I noted before, we didn't have any intermediate-sized glasses, but that wasn't going to stop me from getting this man the exact right amount of milk. No, I needed to find a solution! That solution ended up being filling one of the large glasses halfway. It wasn't the prettiest way to present milk, but it got the job done.
Since yesterday was a playgroup day, our schoolwork time was in the afternoon. I believe the girls prefer doing their assignments while their brothers are asleep; the house is quieter, and Mr. Man does not attempt to climb onto their chairs with them to observe their progress. We breezed through the coloring pages and talked about the Prodigal Son parable some more; Bugaboo managed to figure out that the cause of the father’s great rejoicing was not the son’s mere physical return, but his repentance and changed heart (more on this tomorrow), then moved on to her math assignments. She identified all of the numbers up to 100 and finished her place value exercises without any help from me, and was literally jumping in her chair with the joy of her achievements.
Threads - to match the cotton fabrics from Ditto.
the bridge between your houses,
Books for reluctant readers have a limited vocabulary but you feel no sense of that with Vampire Dawn (which has its own website). And writers of such books don't usually see them reviewed in the national press or on prize shortlists.
The Doctor has been principally played by eleven actors. The transition from one actor to another is written into the plot of the show as regeneration, whereby the character of the Doctor takes on a new body and, to some extent, new personality. Although each portrayal is different, and on occasions the various incarnations have even met one another, they are all meant to be aspects of the same character. The Doctor is currently portrayed by Matt Smith, who took up the role after David Tennant’s final appearance in an episode broadcast on 1 January 2010.
Gamification is a process (toolset) towards engaging users. It’s not about making your business a gaming company. Take out the mechanics and best practices to learn!
2009: Unnamed dkb/br f by Elusive Quality. Unraced.
So, why? Oh yes, why indeed. What could possibly happen that would cause me, a hardcore atheist, to quote scripture? A calendar happened, that’s what.
All the while, You hear each spoken need
Pay $0 and get $1.98 in ECBs (for buying 2 Excedrins)
tasting no fears,
for those of you who have followed me from the beginning of my blogging adventure, you may–or may not–remember my tagline, “rediscovery is constant.”
03 Digsy's Dinner
The most problematic question, said Kepple is whether DPS can do its own checkpoints aimed at searching for money, guns, drugs, stolen cars, etc., as opposed to checking for drivers licenses and liability insurance? Courts look at the intent of the checkpoint, he said, and if the intent is to generate forfeiture revenue that probably won't cut it.
4. Squeezed Timeframes: Quite often the flex part is the last component to be designed in the electronic digital package. Once the product team finally gets around to dealing with the flexible PCB, they may be already at the rear of agenda. This time pressure will be able to push short cuts. Outcome is an inadequately designed product which will have a number of assembly and reliability concerns for the duration of the device. Moreover, you will be made to give cost for quick turn manufacturing.
4:45-5:30 - Get ready for tomorrow's sub (I have a 2 hr pull out tomorrow) and make a few parent phone calls. It's kind of awkward to tell a parent that their student did an impromptu cartwheel in the middle of your RtI class today...
Or labels of any kind
I didn't use Graphic 45 papers on this project, but wanted to share my versatility when it comes to creating scrapbook layouts. I love to layer and use various elements on a layout. On this one, I used circles as the focus of my background. And I just love my little Tim Holtz paper distresser... I use it on almost everything! LOL! Click HERE for my blog post which contains additonal photos, details and a link to my fun video tutorial!
Playing flashlight tag and shadow puppets with the fam in the living room.
My printmaking project was due this past week so I have a few snapshots to share - of course I only had my cell phone to use so they're definitely not detailed but I'll try to get better pictures in the future.
okay. So there's my contribution, people. Just wanted to add my own; I hate being left out.
As he was peering around the passenger seats he heard strange noises coming from the front of the shuttle. He turned in time to see Yurruch with his back to the controls putting his arms in the air and the Drangathian standing there pointing something at him.
Conflicting impressions: It always sucks when the love interest you want is not what you get. I had to work to find happiness with the ending, but I grudgingly accept that it was probably for the best of the characters involved.
It is time the secularists shut up and grew up. They are like spotty adolescents who think themselves clever for cocking a snook at the clergy. Anyone can pick holes in the more absurd myths of religion, just as anyone can make perky fifth-form debating points about the non-existence of God.
Bring the cream to a boil in a small saucepan over medium-high heat. Remove from the heat, and pour it over the chocolate and mascarpone. Whisk until the chocolate is melted and the mixture is smooth.
Who'd like to hear me holler see me spend my dollars
A: Slow 1
Today is the day for all of you that crave a silky-smooth chocolate ball, otherwise known as a truffle. Try making your own. Easy truffle recipes are plentiful online.
You can pay extra for "Business Select", which gets you on the plane first to avoid the cattle call (and gets you a free drink and extra rewards points).
1. The report told Americans that there are Palestinian Christians. Right wing Israelis have attempted to displace, expropriate and erase the Palestinian nation, and to convince Americans that Palestinians don’t exist or if they do are enemies of the U.S. When the foe of the US was the Soviet Union, they made the Palestinians Communists. When the foe became al-Qaeda, they made the Palestinians violent fundamentalists. But if some percentage of Palestinians is Christians, then that fact disrupts the propaganda. In fact, millions of Palestinians are descended from the 700,000 or so Palestinians ethnically cleansed by the Israelis from what is now Israel in 1948, of whom about 10 percent were Christian.
“I’m so excited to be spending this summer out on the road. There is no better feeling then being out on stage in front of all my fans,” said Enrique Iglesias.
Luckily, my husband offers to watch the kids that afternoon after his conference call for me to run. By that time it is pushing75 degrees and full sun... Too hot for me! So instead, I ran 8 miles on the treadmill, and planned another 6 for Friday to make up my miles. That was my backup plan for the week.
12. What Jail Is Like
Pitching for votes and selling vacuum cleaners. They're jobs that have got a lot more in common than you'd think.
Section 1021 reads as follows:
I spent the next 13km at about 1,000-1,500′ above the ground (2,600′-3,100′ asl) working every little bit of lift, and just letting the wind do the work staying in ones and zeros. I always left myself bailout options vaguely near civilisation, but even though there wasn’t much sun on the ground I seemed to be ok for the time being, however it was clear that I’d need a proper climb if I was going to succeed in making goal.
General Najiya: Did you do this?
BUT AGAIN... ... THOUGHTS OF LAST TIME vs. THIS TIME. Ugh it is such a struggle LAST TIME we were this far along in the pregnancy I was picking out burial plots and baby caskets, funeral outfits and wondering how I would manage to put a hat on his "SMART BOY BUBBLE", planning funeral songs and a euology for a son I wanted so bad to live, a child I carried in my belly for 9months plus two weeks and held in my arms for 25 and a half hours.
I plan on making several of these for Christmas gifts this year.
This is something I should have shared with my friends earlier, as my dear friend already had to go and re-do her school clothes shopping. I have one quick and easy word: ELASTIC. I'm not a fan (mostly for myself....just tacky) but it truly is a must to make sure that your preschooler has the ability to drop those drawers in no time flat or they will be the talk of the class....and not in a good way!
I choose these Yankee candle tarts for my reward this week. It sounds silly but i need little rewards along the way.
Greedy for money
www.meganrix.com
Revelation 2:6
While it is fantastic that business development is gaining more momentum throughout the industry, it should be noted that business development is not for everyone – this does not mean that all credit unions don’t need it – this means that the business development profession is not for everyone.
IS THIS A BACKDOWN?
Pepperwood - a scent blend of cardamom, pepper, rosewood, sandalwood, vetiver, tonka bean, and amber. I've accented the soap with ground cardamom, cardamom pods, and gold glitter.
After 10 weeks of training, three times per week, the heavy and light groups that lifted three sets saw significant gains in muscle volume — as measured by MRI — with no difference among the groups. Still, the group that used heavier weights for three sets developed a bit more strength.
I’m not saying that you should bring your own needles when traveling, but the news report above is frightening.
Choosing a lender for an Iowa cow is not always the map of iowa state fairgrounds and most famous Iowa gay clubs that rank amongst others in the map of iowa state fairgrounds of Iowa, which has made this possible. Efforts have been arrested for serious transgression. Reports of some simple misdemeanors can be found in north-central Iowa. Again, it is almost recession proof. Other than this, the map of iowa state fairgrounds are also required to have the map of iowa state fairgrounds in Ogden, Iowa is considered one of the map of iowa state fairgrounds, there are certain other benefits which are given to the map of iowa state fairgrounds in 1864. Iowa Agricultural College was later renamed as Iowa has to offer.
It gets me out of the house when the walls are closing in on me.
Alphabe Wednesday -- the letter is "N" and I'm taking liberties entering my post as Clinton Hill is full of Notable Architecture!
I'm can't make a bow.
Venus Razor, Refill or Disposable $2/1
* This facility should be used with caution. See system(4).
1 tsp. Pepper....or to taste
Based on your tags, you are equally fascinated with shallowness and reflections. =) Why is that?
I came across this movie today and thought ‘wow’, it captures the beauty that is Annica. The impermanence of all things. The coming and going, the continual flow of change, the ever evolving journey of life, the natural and the innate.
Sir Thomas Malory's Morte d'Arthur is probably my desert island book; I have several editions and have read it many times, since discovering it at university. My Medieval tutor once set me an essay title: 'Malory, the least intelligent author ever to become an English classic.' That was Cambridge in the 60s for you - utter codswallop. (I don't think I used that phrase in my essay).
Maybe that even when life is hard there is a New Eden waiting. It might be across the world, or just a change in our mind and heart, The journey to get there might be harder than we hoped it would be, but it's one we must take and realize that God is always there with us, even when it doesn't seem that way. We have to take the first step.
7:25- Heath and the kids are out the door. He takes them to daycare because it is on his way to work. Our daycare is about half way between my office and his which makes it really convenient if he needs to go in early and I need to take drop off duty for the day. We've been with our daycare provider since Brody was born. We left for a short while but were back because we realized she was the best! I think having Heath drop the kids off and leaving me at home every morning really helps my attitude towards working. If I was leaving them every morning (especially when he was a newborn) I think that I would have a harder time working. It's all mental, but it works for me.
On the bright side, doing
But if still, as I ought to do,
My cousin is getting married this summer and has chosen the most GORGEOUS palette for her bridesmaids (inspired by the Pinterest photo). Isn't this just stunning? Oh how I would have loved something like pinterest when I was getting married!
you so much
In terms of roles, I was delighted to have a volunteer to be the Director and general boss of things from the students, her first role was to fill in a Google Calendar with tasks for the upcoming sessions. The other pupils were split up roughly into two groups – the Music Video Group and the Publicity Group. During Friday’s session (9.30-12.00) the Video Concept Group firmed up their ideas and looked at some examples of storyboards before beginning their own. A group of dancers began choreographing a dance to a section of the music (based on Kylie Minogue’s Locomotion!)
The "Project Runway" hottie looked ever-so-sexy as she was decked out in a red and white Santa coat with a black belt, heels and white furry cuffs strapped around her ankles.
There is a history to the Liebster Blog Award - it originated in Germany and means dearest or beloved, and Liebe is the word for love.
Mile 9 - 10:47
John DeWolfe isn't the first person you would think of when you hear the word 'ringer'. I mean, for most of his professional life he was a respected literature and poetry critic--not exactly a Fox Mulder, you understand? But in order to make ends meet, DeWolfe has in recent times taken up a new profession: writer of lurid tabloid paperback books about such subjects as UFO's, satanic cults, and unexplained phenomenon. So while he's no Fox Mulder, he is a poor man's Kolchak (who was Mulder's spiritual godfather anyway), and the Dynamic Duo team up to solve this Merry Mystery.
We got up kind of late, but not nearly late enough. I was still tired and felt really bad and sick in the morning. We ate hotel breakfast and then I tried to sleep while Jon did some paperwork. Eventually we got going and went down to Beale Street. It was really hot and sunny out. We walked around and decided to get lunch at this place called Pig. It was bbq, of course. I got a pork plate and Jon got a turkey sandwich. It was really, really good. The meat was super tender and great. They also had big-ass 32 oz beers for 5-6.50. We walked around on Beale after lunch and shopped at a few stores. I was wearing a jumper and decided that was a very bad choice of festival gear! I had to take the whole thing down every time I went to the bathroom, and you really don't want to spend any extra time in the porta-potties when it's 93 degrees outside. So we decided to go find a dress. Jon found one he liked for me and then we went to the festival. On the way we spotted a line of horse-drawn carriages and Jon thought we should get a ride.
Wanting to be the “loudest group on the planet”, Tufnel invented an amplifier that has a Max Setting of “11” whereas most mortal amplifiers go up to “10“.
On the 5th of April 1453, the Ottoman Turkish Sultan, Mehmet II “The Conqueror” (1451-1481) arrived to join his army establishing its siege of Constantinople. The people of the city had experienced many long sieges over the preceding centuries. They had reason to hope; the thousand-year old walls of Theodosius remained strong, and their faith in the Virgin Mary was unshakeable. How many times had She saved the city before? Why would She not save them again?
“As that river goes down, you don’t know how many people are under it,” Arkansas Gov. Mike Beebe said.
For the most part, I love it, all these interesting ideas, things to read, things to watch, things to think about. I love the stimulation and the creativity. But at the moment, it's all becoming too much, there is too much going on, I can't focus and it's distracting me from other important things in my life.
“Affirming Gasland” concludes with a supplemental extended reading section that includes an article from ProPublica and the Denver Post that addresses the subject of the migration of gas in greater detail: Colorado Study Links Methane in Water to Drilling, by Abrahm Lustgarten, ProPublica, April 22, 2009.
The control is where we expose the event created (the onAddNote, onEditNote, onSearchNote, etc) to the view. Note that how the property name defined in the refs is used. And then we create an event item property and the corresponding event function. E.g. When a view is firing event “addNoteCommand” to the view NoteListContainer, we need to do this:
While some may view these warnings by lawyers about nonlawyers to be self-serving (and it is), the warnings are also equally necessary to educate the public so each person can make an informed choice before deciding to engage a lawyer or nonlawyer to assist with an immigration case.
A nutritionally complete soy-based, lactose-free formula. Suitable for babies / children with cow's milk allergy, lactose intolerance, galactosemia and those on a vegetarian diet.
And everyone sees a different fragment.
84 The Remains of the Day – Kazuo Ishiguro *
Here in South Africa (and this applies equally to the public and private sectors) dishonesty and incompetence are either rewarded or simply ignored. With a few exceptions, those who expose and confront the truth - and who try to uphold collective and personal accountability - are punished, marginalised and labelled.
I love seeing the excitement of students finishing their first pieces. One student said she wished she had a padded room so she could jump around in it; she was so elated with her enameled ring! It is really thrilling. I love being able to pass along all I’ve learned over the years.
We can see this kind of scene everywhere now, but women in the Ukraine have been an essential and active part of the military since the days of Russian rule, and I was moved to see so many of them marching with the veterans of WWII.
I have hats that family and friends have found and some I picked up myself. Two of the hats I own belonged to my grandmother.
Finally, did the early church actually accept pseudepigraphal literature? Could it actually be accepted into the canon? It seems that the bold declaration of history to both these questions is a strong negative. Tertullian, Serapion, Origen and the Muratorian fragment speak out aggressively against early pseudepigraphal works.
This was something you needed to know.
I thank God for my financial securities.
and i'm not even busy!
Defense lawyers argue that Lynn tried to address the problem as secretary for clergy from 1992 to 2004, but was blocked by the late Cardinal Anthony Bevilacqua and others in the Philadelphia archdiocese.
For there are ghosts in the air
After all, a movie that has pie fights:
We are in a war – not with other humans, but with the devil and his demons. His goal is to defeat us and he will use whatever means available to that end. His strategy – and yes, he has one – is to bombard us with nagging thoughts of doubt, fear, wonderings, speculations, theories, and reasonings, and if we choose to entertain these thoughts, we hold the door open and usher the enemy in. Then before we know it, we begin to agree with him…and strongholds, fortresses, are constructed to protect those agreements. It is these strongholds that separate us from the truth of the situation:
To begin with, we are treated to only four of the 23 surviving films, and those four prints have more than their fair share of fading, scratches and dust specks. One film is even missing a couple of reels. Most of the films and supplements are plagued with faulty English subtitles. Furthermore, The Housemaid (하녀, 1960), the most eagerly anticipated title, is not included in this set (it will be released separately). So just why must you own this set?
Rosie Huey, a spokeswoman for the Customs and Border Patrol, declined to comment on that episode but said agents patrol both sides of the fence.
Smell your hands for a minimum of 45 minutes for a proper and thorough examination and diagnosis.
The whole purpose of me visiting these markets was to save money and buy only fresh, seasonal produce. By the time I opened my purse a couple of times, $50 soon disappeared, defeating the purpose. Many market entrepeneurs are calling these markets 'farmer's' markets in the hope of attracting a steady stream of regular Sunday shoppers and making a lot of money. This particular market I went to had more craft and food stalls than fresh produce so definitely a lot more to spend your money on.
Some things are still sacred.
A journey through your soul in order to find the faith and strength to cope,
* Jack lights the dynamite, telling Hurley, if he wants to die, so be it.
Here’s the recipe we followed:
Talk about hurtful! Glasses don’t suddenly make you less fun! We need them to SEE. The only thing that makes us not so fun (well in my personal opinion) is the rain. Rain on glasses is not fun. Rain on glasses is a pain in the bum. Apart from that girls in glasses are obviously totally awesome.
~ Ros Crawford
"I Love You" Banner: Paper Pups Cricut cartridge cut at 1 1/4" with the shadow
Were there any puzzles - any connections that you noticed?
In-jail solidarity uses our strength of numbers to raise the political and economic costs of the system. It cost the authorities both economically and politically to keep large numbers of people locked up after an action, especially if we can mobilize outside pressure. Large numbers of people in jail can give us lots of leverage with the system.
This was the central question preoccupying Canadian church representatives when we gathered together in Waterloo from February 2-3 for the Just Peace Symposium. Organized by MCC coalition partner Project Ploughshares, this meeting provided a valuable opportunity for 25 leaders and representatives from eight denominations—Anglican, Christian Reformed, Friends (Quaker), Lutheran, Mennonite, Presbyterian, United Church, and Unitarian—to share insights and commitments to peacemaking as articulated by our respective traditions.
But, I do have something else for you...remember my client with the 80's tract home?
“Why categorise the recipients so blatantly according to their parliamentary constituencies?.
The current situation concerns my flatmate, who I have mentioned a couple of times previously. We have a forced friendship, in which we attend the same university in New Zealand, and were both coming to the same Spanish university for the same semester, and so it was suggested that we find accommodation together, as it would be convenient. Under normal circumstances I can’t imagine us ever being friends – I may be shy, but she is timid and nervous, unwilling to take even the slightest of risks; she complains like there is no tomorrow (more than me, I swear!), but not about things that deserve complaints, but rather in the way a spoilt child complains that they haven’t gotten their way, and continues to complain and complain and complain…; she is extremely stubborn, which just rubs me up totally the wrong way, and hand in hand with the stubbornness comes the close mindedness, her complete inability to see things from a different point of view, to not lay blame, and to just accept that sometimes the world works in ways we can’t explain, and don’t necessarily like. Anyways, she gets on my nerves. And I live with her, I can’t escape her. I don’t think I’m explaining quite as I want to…
17. The country is a favourite with the Royal family, who holiday at Balmoral castle in Royal Deeside.
Supplies used: cardstock - blue; patterned papers - Candy Confetti, Apple Spritz, Blue Lemonade, Orange Pop, Tropical Twist and Calipso Punch in Bubblegum Hills Collection by KaiserCraft; pearls and gems - Hero Arts; Dymo label maker; Martha Stewart punch; Silhouette Studio cut files; Pop Dots.
June ’10 Nine GSA employees attended another planning meeting, this one at a Marriott Hotel in Denver, Colorado.
I feel I'm going to be writing less and less about A. There's plenty going on with her (mostly good, some slightly worrying - from a protective Mum point of view!) but it just doesn't seem right to be writing about her so much any more. I've always checked with her that she's ok with what I'm writing, but even that seems like a bit of an intrusion these days.
- '5-Simple-Ingredient Recipe' Posts
You Know It’s a Crisis When…
“Illinois residents, whose income taxes rose by a record last year to help close a budget deficit, are paying the price again for the state’s fiscal mismanagement. With its pile of unpaid bills growing about 30% this year, the weakest pension-funding ratio among states and falling federal aid, Illinois and its municipalities are paying a penalty above AAA debt that’s twice their five-year average. Illinois plans to issue $1.8 billion of debt as soon as next week…”
Other news - we allow children in to eat. All jokes about what they taste like will be frowned upon unless genuinely funny. Today we had a family in the lower bar, with a young child wandering around the small room at the end. I walked over and asked him to go sit with his mum and dad, at which point the dad came over and asked if there was a problem.
I am taking a short break, but I will be back on 14 May with another exciting challenge on Inspiration Avenue. I will be putting my thinking cap on and hope to have a really inspirational challenge for both you and myself!
Himsters
2 cups buckwheat groats
i guess i can say adam was the toy stealer, problem causer, or as he was named, "the destroyer" boy this time... i think he's figuring out if he plays with parker and jantsen or the younger kids... it was pretty funny i won't lie. At one time, he put on his cowboy boots and stomped over the big kids' legos. haha parker and jantsen didn't think it was so funny. another thing happened, we would hear abigail let out a scream and then adam would come running up the stairs yelling, sorry sorry!! it was pretty funny. all though he started doing it a little too much, so of course he got in trouble for it too.
But see, that’s why I started a blog. To enlist readers to make my decisions for me. That’s right. I’m gave up. Threw in the towel. I let someone else be the one to decide which book I read for English. Or whether or not I accepted an invitation to join the debate team from that cute-in-a-dorky-sort-of-way guy who gave me the Heimlich Maneuver in the cafeteria. (Note to self: Chew the melon before swallowing it.) I even let them decide who I dated!
When her parents die, teenager Gail Dorjee retreats into an angry, sarcastic shell. She hopes it will ease her pain, but all it gets her is a one-way trip from Kansas to a Seattle boarding school, the elite Osland Academy.
- 1 28oz can chickpeas, rinsed and drained
As with any large group of people, there are going to be the good, the bad, and the ugly. But, just from the ones I know on a personal basis, I see that God hasn’t written off these men and women. Evidently, God isn’t bound by our social standards, and I have come to feel that He has put my husband and I here for a purpose.
The elder Cherokee, with eyes that have seen too much, lifted his grandson’s face so his eyes looked into the boy’s face. Grandfather said, “Let me tell you a story. I too, at times, have felt a great hate for those who have taken so much with no sorrow for what they do. But hate wears you down and does not hurt your enemy. It is like taking poison and wishing your enemy would die. I have struggled with these feeling many times. It is as if two wolves are inside me…. It is a terrible fight.
I made the same coffee chiffon batter (since I looooooove coffee), and baked it up as regular cupcakes and also as mini cupcakes. The results were drastically different.
But I have found a photograph and it comes from one of the splendidly annotated albums of my Uncle Frank. It is precisely dated "Liverpool 1940" and the page is entitled "They Remind Us". There are two photographs of planes high in the sky. Under one it says "one of ours" and under the other "one of theirs". The large photograph shows "one of theirs" - I am featuring theirs not from any unpatriotic motive, it is just a better and sharper image - whilst the enlargement to the left shows "one of ours". No doubt, there will be people who can tell me precisely what types of planes these are - back in Liverpool in 1940, Uncle Frank could obviously spot the difference between the outlines of the RAF and the Luftwaffe (I suppose back in those days it was a necessary and important skill).
- gae
To be designated as a "fit child," one has to pass the test in all six areas. I guess in a world where general intelligence of children is measured by testing in about 6 subjects, it only makes sense that physical fitness would be measured in exactly the same way. But the PFT is even worse than the academic testing that our children have to endure. Because at least the schools try to teach the kids what will be on the academic tests before testing them.
Peace to you Sista's!
The PLCB should be abolished because the idea that sales of wine and spirits need to be "controlled" makes no sense when compared to other products: guns, explosives, drugs, tobacco, cars, airplanes, knives, power tools... The State collects taxes on wine and spirits, but it collects taxes on beer, too: through the distributors. The State makes its mark-up on wine and spirits; why not have the State sell everything, then, from groceries to fishing rods? It makes no sense, and if it weren't for the blanket interpretation of the 21st Amendment that states can do whatever they want with alcohol, it would be gone.
Because of the rocks, he named the place Isla Negra, Black Island, and with the help of local carpenters started to build his house. In that house he composed some of his major works like “The Heights of Machu Pichu” and “The Captain’s Verses”
On Wednesday morning, I got a text from my friend Amy, who runs the blog A Girl and Her Kindle and is my cohost on the Facebook page "Andi Reviews With a Girl and Her Kindle" (see the side bar). She said that refurbished Kindle Fires were on sale in the Gold Box Deal of the Day for only $139. That's $60 cheaper than brand new. No stranger to refurbished electronics, I jumped onto the opportunity and purchased it. The last time thatI had tried, they were immediately sold out. I got lucky.
The long tail of vehicles behind bobbed about cartoonishly, heads within craning for a look. Salesmen revving.
Even still, It was still very “distant” to me. I would not have anticipated being even where we are now with the Equal Money System where in now I am getting a sense of how one actually take a point that is not yet here and bring it here. Create it, Manifest it. Which is what is happening/what we involved with Desteni are doing with an Equal Money System.
5. I have zero interest in watching sports on television. That includes the superbowl. My spellcheck just informed me that "superbowl" should be capitalized. I refuse.
After some time, and with no more hyenas joining the fray, the hyenas almost lost interest and conceded defeat and simply lay down a couple of metres from the lions, and waited until they had had their share before leaving the scraps for the scavengers!
Complex and curious, this isn't a beer to gulp, it's one to savor and discover. Try it!
This little girl was speechless when she got home and saw her room. Her mom said she just stared, and stared. Then she said, "Now I don't have a geek's room anymore. I feel so special."
Why didn’t someone step forward and admit their mistake?
The story itself was engaging and nail-biting. It twisted in directions I could have never imagined and it manages to keep you on your toes. The research that must have gone into this is mind-boggling; it was just so informative and rich with facts. It was smarter than it had any right to be.
When to use: Whenever you hear the name of an obscenely obscure bowl game. Feel free to replace “Sex Cauldron” with the name of the bowl but be warned: shouting “Sex Cauldron” is extremely fun.
Yes. I do have a few good stories here. This may be inappropriate, but I’ll tell it anyway. I had a part in ‘Van Wilder: Freshman Year’ as nerd Irving Peppler. We were shooting a scene in which Van finds me and some other nerds drunk and partying. I’m standing on top of a Humvee and there is a half-naked girl hanging on to me and we’re drinking booze out of an army helmet. Anyway, when we were shooting this scene, the actress who was playing the half-naked girl wanted her nipples to be hard for the shot. Since they were not, she got some ice from the wardrobe department and began rubbing the ice on her nipples. After she was finished, she asked me if they looked hard enough, and I said yes. I don’t think she believed me or she wasn’t satisfied with the hardness. I always felt like kinda bad because I don’t think she was happy with how her nipples looked and it seemed to bother her during the shooting of the scene. Luckily, in the movie, you only see her in the wide shot, so it’s probably not discernible.
Once you have a basic idea of what you want and how much you want to pay for it, then this is a good time to go to your local dealership. Any questions that you were not able to answer, the dealership should be able to answer them. Take a test drive of the car you want and make sure it’s comforting to you. You don’t want to drive a car that makes you feel awkward, especially since you’ll have this product for quite a while.
Crafted by the elder wizard Gobodkin, this small copper ring is decoratively engraved with a garland of daisies. The ring is endowed with a mild dweomer which makes the wearer smell fresh and clean at all times, regardless of how filthy the wearer's clothing or personal hygiene. The ring will magically expand or contract to fit and can only be removed by writing the word "eateses" in dwarvish with the hand wearing the ring.
Therapist: My sister is settling into her new place. She hopes to have functional internet by the weekend. I will send you a g-note when I am back on line regularly, until then, I just check email when I go to town.
In order to teach my body to use the nutrients and energy in food in the best way, I have to daily remind it of our goal. Aerobic and resistance exercises help to reduce fat and increase muscle which in turn increases metabolism.
In fiction, and in life, everyone needs a breather, a time out, or just a break. Sometimes we can’t control the pace of reality, but as writers we get to show our characters some mercy from time to time.
Well, I had to enter...who wouldn't want a ornament of their pup, right!
-Eyegazer in Runweld Basement lower levels (Gazes at enemies that sometimes makes them lose a turn. Works on bosses!)
The educational potential seems obvious. So why have museums and educationalists, with all the information and resources at their disposal, failed to make more than a handful of really compelling educational games? The work of game designers and researchers such as Jane McGonigal (author of Reality is Broken) and Channel 4 Education (including the Wellcome Trust-funded Routes) has amply demonstrated the power of games to bring both children and adults cultural and scientific ideas in new forms.
This Saturday is the General Young Women's Meeting for our church and the girls get to be part of a choir that will be performing during the meeting. I've only been able to sit in on a little bit of some of the rehearsals, but I'm been so impressed with the choir director. One of the songs is entitled "Guardians of Virtue." She has talked with the girls a lot about maintaining their virtue. She has told them that every time they listen to gossip, they lose a little virtue and every time they participate in perpetuating it, they lose a little more.
Today I noticed that 3 out of 5 girls wore cute dresses and accessorized and wore make-up to work. My cousin wore her LBD. I wore my violet cover-up dress with my white tank top and my black pants to work.
Famous Poems as Mentor Texts. William Carlos Williams’s “This is Just to Say” is one of the most recognized and shared poems in American literature. What better way to introduce children to canonical poems than following Gail Carson Levine’s lead and using them as mentor texts for students’ own writing? Share a variety of well known poems that are familiar to both adults and children, and have students select a few that appeal to them. Then, referring to the author note in the middle of Forgive Me, I Meant to Do It, walk students through the craft and structure of the famous poems they choose. Scholastic offers an online writing workshop with several famous children’s poets, including Jack Prelutsky, Karla Kuskin, and Jean Marzallo, called “Writing with Writers” (see Further Explorations below). You may also want to share Sharon Creech’s verse novels, Love That Dog and Hate That Cat, in which Jack models his poems after famous ones by Walter Dean Myers and Robert Frost.
Allah maha besar, I feel really blessed! 14 wonderful weeks the baby in mummy tummy. Rezeki yang diberi tidak akan disiakan dan akan sihat sempurna, InsyaAllah.
The recipe works. If you treat it as funeral food.
That I have ever loved.
Chances are your palate is under-developed. No worries, everyone has this at one point in life, and few develop it passed "average". Now, I'm no expert in flavor detection, I'm still developing my palate. Perhaps there's no 'end-game' in palate improvement...an ongoing process. Yet, once you get started, you'll be glad you did.
To be honest, this cabbage soup is more than just boiled cabbage, it is a pot of winter vegetables delicately infused with thyme and parmesan. The recipe is very forgiving, you can mix the vegetables in whatever proportion you have on hand and add or remove ingredients freely. And it makes for great leftovers.
I know I've mentioned before how much I love trees. The irony is that our house sits on a lot with sad, little Charlie Brown Christmas trees. There's even a dead one out back right now. So sad! I think it's fun that today's RAK would not only benefit the recipient, but will beautify the earth at the same time.
on marble floors, hundreds of thousands of dollars in medical aid poured into fancy furniture and Persian rugs. I feel the artificial heat pouring in through air vents and think of children screaming for clean water. I squint through crystal chandeliers and hear mothers begging for mercy. I see a superficial world existing in the midst of a terrorizing reality and I can’t move. I can’t
Je me suis levé(e).
The first draft took about six weeks. I was lucky in that I went on a writing retreat for three weeks. Well- I was working as a writer in residence actually but had lots of writing time. I got most of that first draft down in that time. Then it was back to reality. And as always, I spent a lot longer editing than writing. I think it was finished about nine months later.
Lent is a word you will hear thrown out commonly around this time of year. The Season of Lent is observed, though not required, by most protestant churches. This season originated in the church during the 4th century and marks the 40 weekdays that lead up to Easter Sunday. Forty days signifies the time that Jesus spent in the wilderness fasting and being tempted as he prepared for His ministry. The Sundays in Lent, or the 6 Sundays leading up to Easter, do not count and are seen as days of celebration of the resurrection of Jesus.
herself. Her mother was not as understanding,
In my grumpy state I basically wrote today off, fitness wise, and proceeded to have a nap while watching HGTV with Scout on the couch. When I woke up the sky was clearing and the sun was peaking through the clouds. Ok, maybe today isn’t so bad after all. I did some chores around the house, and now the sun is out, the air is the perfect run temperature, and I’m dressed and ready to go. Oh I’m also going to a different community pool tonight, where they have more lanes, and I doubt many people will be just floating in the pool at 9 pm. Let’s hope so, anyway.
NA: What was it like becoming a solo artist? You’re used to playing as a member of a group, right?
The United Nations refugee agency said today it is scaling up its help to people fleeing recent fighting in north-western Pakistan.
Linda here, back again this week with yet another card made with the delightful Flower Market plate. That's three weeks in a row for me. Can you tell I'm really hooked on this plate? At least this time I broke away for the Tattered Rose colors and moved on to Broken China. I used several different images from the plate and stamped the background with jet black archival ink. A couple of squirts of Biscotti Perfect Pearls gave the background such a lovely shimmer. The main panel was cut with the Vintage Cabinet Card die and run through the Damask texture fade that had been inked up with a metallic gold ink. I love all the butterflies that were sponged with Broken China and Scattered Straw and then fussy cut out.
Satan hates you…he hates me…he hates everyone! He wants nothing more than to destroy our lives. His method of destruction is never quick and painless…he favors the slow, agonizing, excruciating pain-filled type of torture. He knows that he will ultimately lose the war, but he wants to win as many battles against us as possible, so he wages a fight every chance he gets. Make no mistake…he never comes to battle unarmed. He does his homework…he knows every weakness we have and he takes full advantage of that knowledge. He attacks us in our weakness because he knows he is more likely to gain victory there. He also knows our strengths and he tries to battle us in such a way that we cannot access those strengths. So, what are we to do? God’s Word gives us our instructions for battle:
There are days when I’ll feel somewhat OK, but I’ll admit (and sound like a whiner): it’s hard down here.
strawberry jam to give them a jewel-like finish, and sprinkle toasted sliced almonds around the tart’s edge. This pretty, spring tart has all the flavor of the original cheesecake, but it’s a lot easier to make, leaving more time to enjoy this lovely spring weather we’ve been having. And it also makes a wonderful dessert to honor Mom on her special
When the dishes were cleared the exacting couple were surprisingly complimentary about their meal.It was proclaimed delicious..'Much better than the last one we had here which was GREEN..'
I know it’s not my camera. Or it better not be the freakin’ camera.
just a piece of apple brownie alone is satisfying enough.
Doreen also explains cord cutting and the different methods you can employ in removing them. You will also learn to lift curses, remove entities, shield against psychic attacks. There is also a very comprehensive list of 15 Archangels and their specialities.
But the bright lemon, saffron daffodils
Khairul Helmi advises me to chill out first. Getting into a relationship when we both are still struggling to stand on our own feet and stabilize our financial is hard. So, if the feeling is real, let us see if we are gonna meet in a few years to come and fall for each other again because at the moment, it is just me who is head over heels in love with him.
Well over half of the world’s hungry people–some 578 million people–live in Asia and the Pacific region. Africa accounts for just over one quarter of the world’s hungry population.(Source: FAO, The State of Food Insecurity in the World, 2010).
As much as the kids like this book, they REALLY like the other animal books we have around our classroom. My favorite animal books are the DK books. Here's a link to Amazon, to see a few good titles. Many of these books are available at the public library as well.
Easter weekend has definitely been hectic, so I am running a bit tardy on the "F" post for the A-Z challenge...but that is o-kay! Hope all of you had a spectacular weekend, even if you weren't celebrating Easter :)
For our first challenge, we will be making a card with the Jedi image below. Since Valentine's Day is approaching we will start off with a LOVE theme! You can use any colors that you would like and decorate it any way that you would like! =D
In 2010 a single huia feather sold at auction for $8400.
I know it's Taco Tuesday, and some sort of taco recipe would be appropriate, but since yesterday was Monday, which is, in some foodie circles now apparently called "Meatless Monday", I figured this vegetarian recipe from the weekend would also be good. Plus, I had photos ready and could post it now, instead of later tonight, which could end up being much much later tonight, since I've got an abundance of errands & chores that need attention after work.
